Passage No.	Content Description	Language / Register (Date)	Key Concept / Subject Matter	Source Support
I	Philosophical Dialogue/Chronicle fragment: Meditation on the dual nature of the state, the founding law (Slovowaurd), civic peace (mirfriþdomi), and the synthesis of two roots (dvosunc).	High Gothoslavic (Vysoka Slavogothika) (Speculative: c. 1080 CE / Gotho-Slavic Golden Age).	The Word-Law (Slovowaurd) and Dual Identity (dvujazykъ).Exemplifies compounding (e.g., rukskriftsahus) and binomialism.	
II	Incident Dialogue (Inspector NOVAK and ARCHIVGOTH AMAL): Concerns an administrative anomaly (missorinnja) where a valve (walvas) at Velehrad-17 opened (uslukide) without record (bez zapisa), resulting in red liquid (Watōrinn rōþs) flow.	High Bogothic (MSB) Archival Register (c. 1970s).	Administrative Failure and Gerab. The initial conflict of "unmeasured flow" versus documented fact.	
III	Administrative Inquiry (NOVAK and SYNODMAGISTER LUKAS): Discussion of the administratīva upir(unregistered man, čovekbezbroj) whose existence challenges the state's Gerab(Measure), requiring documentation of the lost Klawis(Key).	High Bogothic (MSB) Administrative Register (c. 1970s).	The Administrative Vampire (ni-skrifts dauþa-ƕeits), defined as "undocumented vitality" (nedokumentovana vitalnost).	
IV	Scene Heading: The setting of the archive, titled "ECHO BEZ VORDA I SVETSKRIFTS" (The Echo Without a Word and the Holy Writings).	High Bogothic (MSB) Archival Register (c. 1970s).	The ArchiveLightHouse (ArhīvSvetDom).Confirms the narrative context.	
V	Administrative Persona (ARCHIVGOTH AMAL Monologue, Internal Section II): AMAL defends the use of Gothickoreni(Gothic core lexicon) and Latin terms for legal authority against the Slavic vernacular (Slavicmora).	High Bogothic (MSB) Archival Register (c. 1970s).	Linguistic Purity and Administrative Authority. The role of the Kanalkánstva(Canal Bureaucracy) in documenting the flow (tokwatō).	
VI	Theological Rationale (Gudja Alarik Monologue, Internal Section III): Asserting that chaos (smert) is merely nepravilni eho (irregular echo) and is conquered by the written word (Slovowaurd).	High Bogothic (MSB) Archival Register (c. 1970s).	Gerab as Divine Order. The philosophical principle that "Nema smert bez pisana" (There is no death without writing).	
X	Critical Commentary and Context: Defines the preceding narrative as a folk tale written in High Bogothic (MSB) that uses the Upirto illustrate the creed: Bogothia conquers chaos "not with Blot (blood), no with Gerab".	Modern Historiography (c. 1970s analysis).	The Triumph of Bureaucracy over Chaos. Comparison of Bogothic precision versus SorboGothic creole/regional chance (náhoda).	
XXII	Existential Lament: The narrator expresses despair in prison (dlougyčas to bylъ!) and a desperate need for reading material (Ačьbykniga jest!—If only there were a book!).	High Slavogothic (Vernacular/Slovorealismus Style) (Speculative: c. 12th–13th Century / Medieval Transition).	Psychological Realism and Compound Creation. Also includes complex terms: stjaročis(star-eye).	
XXV	Diplomatic Oratory: A warning concerning imperial deceit and the transfer of the Roman Empire (prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma), asserting that the situation requires urgent reason (razummiselj).	High Slavogothic (Formal Chancery Oratory) (Speculative: c. 11th Century / Golden Age).	Diplomatic Treachery.Translation of classical rhetoric (Belisarius' warning).	
LX	Legal/Orthographic Mandate: Defines the distinct identity of the SorboGothic dialect, including its conservatism regarding consonants (þ, w, ð) and its need to escape the influence of central Bogothic spelling.	Latinate Administrative Mandate (Explicit: 1803).	SorboGothic Linguistic Separatism.Codification of the SorboGothic language as an instrument for history and governance.	
LXI	Vernacular News Excerpt: Report on a modern folklore festival (Festiwalu Mírvra), mentioning the preservation of ancient rituals like the Specularum observantia and raþiwulþ piesně.	Modern Standard Sorbian/SorboGothic Creole (Explicit: 14. Oktobr 2025).		


A SELECTION OF GOTHOSLAVIC LITERATURE

I.

1.  V mirfriþdomi stoit rod ljudin, i v rukskriftsahus zivi duchahus.
2.  Slovowaurd rodzi se iz tihi misel i grajda svetliuhs nad vodom.
3.  Ni bogwalds bez milospravda, ni reikdom bez zakonmild.
4.  Kto čita rukskrifts, ne gleda samo bukruny, no slusha glassrdьc.
5.  I tak sja slovowaurd prinosi na stoldomu: jeden hleb, dvoje koreni.
6.  Z tego rastet mirfriþ i bogljubsti, kako dvosunc nad edynzemja.
7.  Amensofi, tak pisati i tak žiti jest zakonsvet.


II.

V mirfriþdomi stoit rod ljudin i v rukskriftsahus zivi duchahus.
Slovowaurd rodzi se iz tihi misel i grajda svetliuhs nad vodom.
Ni bogwalds bez milospravda ni reikdom bez zakonmild.
Kto čita rukskrifts ne gleda samo bukruny no slusha glassrdьc.
Tak slovowaurd prinosi na stoldomu jeden hleb dvoje koreni.
Iz tego rostet mirfriþ i bogljubsti kako dvosunc nad edynzemja.
Tam kde svetliuhs pada na hladny kamen probuja seme slovowaurda.
Stary pisar sedi pri svitci rukskriftsahusa i videnie mu greze nad glavou.
On vidit ljudi prai mladы, s mečem i s perom, s duchem i s telom jedino.
On zapisuje: slovowaurd ne umira, samo menja glas.
I glas novi nosit mirfriþdomu ime staryh bogov i novu milospravdu.
Tak zakonmild budi, i svetliuhs rastvorja tьmъ.
Amen sofi.

III.

Kral mira sedel v dompolisgarde, i slušal pesen erosmilosťi.
V glas sumny tumanšar igraše svetoduch, i v očah njegovyh sjajet svetliuhs ljuboti.

IV.

V tihiveče ordadoma gorět svitliuhs nad zerkalom viny.
Kral Reiktheoswalds sam sedi pri stoldomu z milospravdno tvare i mysli na narodljudь,
kotory spí pod kamnigradom i vidit sny o mirfriþu bez krvь.

„Rukskriftsahus spi,“ reče on, „no slovowaurd živi.
Glasduchgeist ne umira, tokmo menja masku.“
I v tomhle glasu byla sila ducha i milosť bogljubsti,
jaka plamenlogos izkamňa, kotory razsvetlaet tьmъ i ne goret.

Togda všed poetpisar Aram Tumanšar, syn kupca iz Zalfmarka, pad k nogam kralja i reče:
„Gospodi Reiktheoswalds, v rukah mojih novy rukskrifts, pisany na pergameni tjurkorda,
slova mixleny iz trix koreni: slav, goth, helén.
Hčiš li slyšati, kako oni pejut o ljuboti i razumkrugu?“

Kral smehnul, i v smeh tom byla i mudrost i ustalost.
„Čitaj, Aram, syn tumanov,“ skaza on. „Nechaj mir slyšat svoj glas v trojjazykь.
Možet bytь, tam gde slova sčipajutsja, roditsja novyj boglogos.“

I poet čital. I slova ego byli kak listьja v vetri, časti raznych dervьev, no odnoj tenьju.
Kral—Kral sklonil golovu, i v očah jego sjajel svetliuhs dvux solnc.


V.

Pod bleštlivym nebum Karanpolisa plaval korab dompolisgardy, zvaný DuoSunc, i v jego korvini stoit mlada junka Luba von Zalfmark, oči jekutny kak tьmьa i smех světlý jak svitliuhs nad vodom.

S nej byl kapitan Ardar Reikson, syn starago rodu friþdomarev, čьja rukă znala i meč i pero, i v srьdci jeho gorěla želanьja ne zlata, no slovawaurda i milospravdy.

Dva dnja oni šli po moru, vidяjŭ orduoblaka na vьstoku, gde begtarqan stavlil sveti straji protiv kralя Bogtheoswaldsa.  I večerom, kogda tumanšar padl nad palubom, Luba stala pri borte, drža rukopis malъkij, v koem pisala pesen о ljuboti, o strasti i о zakonmildsvobodi.

Ardar pristupil ticho i reče s úsměvom:
„Junka Luba, tvoi slova gorjat jak ogonь v sněhu.  Kto učil tja tak pletati runy i bukruny v jedinь tkanь ljuboti?“

Ona smehnula i reče: „Nikto, gospodin kapitan.  Jaz slušala more i ono mne govorilo.  Každa volna govori na dvujazykъ: jedna slav, druga goth, i jaz tolkovala im srcem.“

Togda Ardar vzjal knigu i čital:

“Kogda dva sunca vstanut nad jedyn zemja,
togda mirfriþ rastet v rukah ljubovnikov.
Bogljubstь svyže vsь bogov i raskovaje ordy ljudьske.”

Slova byli jak med i železo, jak glasduch i mečpravdy.  Kapitan sklonil glavu i reče:
„Ty pisala to ne rukoj, no duchem, i ten duch jest zrodon iz vsech jazykov.  V tvoej pesni govori mirčelovek, i jaz uslyšal ego.“

Na tom slove morje uтихло, i tumanoblaka raskryli dvosunc.  Svitliuhs pal na Lubu i Ardar, i kazdogo videnie bylo drugomu zerkalo.

I tak načalo se povest o Lube i Ardarovi, o slovowaurde i meče, o tom kako bogtheoswalds sam naklonil neba, da by ljubostь stala zakonom, i zakon — ljubostъ.

VI.
Pesen DvoJazyka: O Zakonu RinnWalve
(A Song of the DualTongue: On the Law of the FlowValve)
I. Reiktheoswalds vlada v dompolisgardu svojem, Nad zakonrištu, srdьce nad slovogovem. On vidi, kak baurgljud pod kamnigradom spi I čovek v snu iščet mirfriþ večny prekkrvi.
II. Dvosunc nam ljošt dalo, duchahus slovom pisa, jedna svetvolja krvьživot dva naroda skisa. Glasduchgeist večen jest, ne pozna tьmьu ni kraj, On živi v walvakrugu, kje vremja teče kaj.
III. Zato walvas rinn okrenul, watō čistohveito teče, Bindar bratstvodomu mirfriþ za vьse reče. Nechaj razumkrug stoit, jak plamenlogos svetlí, V ordadomu ni weins, ni blot usteče priživotí.
IV. Tako skriftsman pisa na pergameni tjurkorda, Da milapravdnost bude rehts dъlo gradgospoda. Budi tihi, wardja stoji na brugges, nad flodvalom, Afskriba peče zakon i waurd kamentelom.

VII.

V tihiveče dompolisgardy Bragō, pod zlatnym Bognebum, ReikTheoswalds Boleslav VII sam sedi u kamenstolu s glasaduchom i mysli na svoj reikdom. Krugulogos jego razuma bil t’mnyhladan, jekutny kako ferroželez, kotoryi matertelo mirfriþa držet v vōrīnátu.
Fuwo, sēna wardja Ulryk Klenov priddja v dvorhallu, i padal na golvu pred HerrReikdomom. Glas Ulryka, slabenizke, ne beše vordslovo, no tochnomjera straha.
“HerrReik, sa walvas Žilega17 uslukida. Na lukjabrugg, tam ležit mrtviživi čovek. Wardjai videše znakspaurōs: ne blotkrvь, no rōdweins, i stary Bogsvitliuhs gori tam, i ne gaslōžit.”
ReikTheoswalds ne dvizhet glavom. On ne saihvat Ulryka, on saihvat v vōrīnātu watōrinna.
“Watō, watō,” on qite, glasaduch mu zvuči u glasu Bogothicu, “watōrinn je prāvo i zakon. Hva qite sa rinn? On živi. Kto uslukide walvas bez klavisključa? Je to voljaduch, ili je to rukahandas čoveka, kotory želi mirfriþ bez mere?”
“HerrReik, wardjai qitu, že to beše čovek od Rinnstrane. On nosil starý bindars na ramene, i jego oči beše crvene jekutny od rodweins. On ne beše slavnijunak, ni wardjasluga. On beše filozofkrotky, kotory videst liuhthbalans i ne gamože nosit.”
ReikTheoswalds Boleslav vzima zlatnu knjigusa i otkritse na stranu DečGerab. “Naš zakon je pisal: Rinn walwas ne spaheit, dok Reikdom ne gaqite pravdaslovom. Idi i uzmi mu njegov bindars i vrati ga nazad v naš dompolisgard. I qitat mu: Sveitliuhs te gleda, no želi čistumeru.”
A tako pošle sēna wardja, Ulryk Klenov, nesuči zlatny lukbindar i bronznu mečželez. I glasaduch od BogTheoswaldsa ostavi samoga, stojeci na mostubrugg, nad vōrīnātom, kade voda teče brzo i ne poznaje granice.

𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽𐍃𐌰𐌲𐌰: 𐍄𐌷𐌴 𐌱𐍂𐌿𐌲𐌲 𐌹 𐍄𐌷𐌴 𐌱𐌻𐌰𐌳𐌴
𐍅 𐍄𐌹𐌷𐌹𐍅𐌴𐍄̈𐌴 𐌳𐍉𐌼𐍀𐍉𐌻𐌹𐍃𐌲𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌹̱ 𐌱𐍂𐌰𐌲𐍉̱, 𐍀𐍉𐌳 𐌶𐌻𐌰𐍄𐌽𐌹̱𐌼 𐌱𐍉𐌲𐌽𐌴𐌱𐌿𐌼, 𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐍄𐌷𐌴𐍉𐍃𐍅𐌰𐌻𐌳𐍃 𐌱𐍉𐌻𐌴𐍃𐌻𐌰𐍅 𐌿𐌹𐌹 𐍃𐌰𐌼 𐍃𐌴𐌳𐌹 𐌿 𐌺𐌰𐌼𐌴𐌽𐍃𐍄𐍉𐌻𐌿 𐍃 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍃𐌰𐌳𐌿𐌷𐍉𐌼 𐌹 𐌼𐌹̱𐍃𐌻𐌹 𐌽𐌰 𐍃𐍅𐍉𐌾 𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐌳𐍉𐌼. 𐌺𐍂𐌿𐌲𐌿𐌻𐍉𐌲𐍉𐍃 𐌾𐌴𐌲𐍉 𐍂𐌰𐌶𐌿𐌼𐌰 𐌱𐌹𐌻 𐍄𐌹̱𐌼𐌽𐌹̱𐌷𐌻𐌰𐌳𐌰𐌽, 𐌾𐌴𐌺𐌿𐍄𐌽𐌹̱ 𐌺𐌰𐌺𐍉 𐍆𐌴𐍂𐍂𐍉𐌶̈𐌴𐌻𐌴𐌶̈, 𐌺𐍉𐍄𐍉𐍂𐌹̱𐌹 𐌼𐌰𐍄𐌴𐍂𐍄𐌴𐌻𐍉 𐌼𐌹𐍂𐍆𐍂𐌹𐌸𐌰 𐌳𐍂𐌶̈𐌴𐍄 𐍅 𐍅𐍉𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌰𐍄𐌿.
𐍆𐌿𐍅𐍉, 𐍃𐌴𐌽𐌰 𐍅𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌾𐌰 𐌿𐌻𐍂𐌹̱𐌺 𐌺𐌻𐌴𐌽𐍉𐍅 𐍀𐍂𐌹𐌳𐌳𐌾𐌰 𐍅 𐌳𐍅𐍉𐍂𐌷𐌰𐌻𐌻𐌿, 𐌹 𐍀𐌰𐌳𐌰𐌻 𐌽𐌰 𐌲𐍉𐌻𐍅𐌿 𐍀𐍂𐌴𐌳 𐌷𐌴𐍂𐍂𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐌳𐍉𐌼𐍉𐌼. 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍃 𐌿𐌻𐍂𐌹̱𐌺𐌰, 𐍃𐌻𐌰𐌱𐌴𐌽𐌹𐌶𐌺𐌴, 𐌽𐌴 𐌱𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐍅𐍉𐍂𐌳𐍃𐌻𐍉𐍅𐍉, 𐌽𐍉 𐍄𐍉𐌷̈𐌽𐍉𐌼𐌾𐌴𐍂𐌰 𐍃𐍄𐍂𐌰𐌷𐌰.
“𐌷𐌴𐍂𐍂𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺, 𐍃𐌰 𐍅𐌰𐌻𐍅𐌰𐍃 𐌶̈𐌹𐌻𐌴𐌲𐌰17 𐌿𐍃𐌻𐌿𐌺𐌹𐌳𐌰. 𐌽𐌰 𐌻𐌿𐌺𐌾𐌰𐌱𐍂𐌿𐌲𐌲, 𐍄𐌰𐌼 𐌻𐌴𐌶̈𐌹𐍄 𐌼𐍂𐍄𐍅𐌹𐌶̈𐌹𐍅𐌹 𐍄̈𐍉𐍅𐌴𐌺. 𐍅𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌾𐌰𐌹 𐍅𐌹𐌳𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐌶𐌽𐌰𐌺𐍃𐍀𐌰𐌿𐍂𐍉𐍃: 𐌽𐌴 𐌱𐌻𐍉𐍄𐌺𐍂𐍅𐌹̱, 𐌽𐍉 𐍂𐍉𐌳𐍅𐌴𐌹𐌽𐍃, 𐌹 𐍃𐍄𐌰𐍂𐌹̱ 𐌱𐍉𐌲𐍃𐍅𐌹𐍄𐌻𐌹𐌿𐌷𐍃 𐌲𐍉𐍂𐌹 𐍄𐌰𐌼, 𐌹 𐌽𐌴 𐌲𐌰𐍃𐌻𐍉𐌶̈𐌹𐍄.”
𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐍄𐌷𐌴𐍉𐍃𐍅𐌰𐌻𐌳𐍃 𐌱𐍉𐌻𐌴𐍃𐌻𐌰𐍅 𐌽𐌴 𐌳𐍅𐌹𐌶̈𐌷𐌴𐍄 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍅𐍉𐌼. 𐍉𐌽 𐌽𐌴 𐍃𐌰𐌹𐌷𐍅𐌰𐍄 𐌿𐌻𐍂𐌹̱𐌺𐌰, 𐍉𐌽 𐍃𐌰𐌹𐌷𐍅𐌰𐍄 𐍅 𐍅𐍉𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌰𐍄𐌿 𐍅𐌰𐍄𐍉𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽𐌰. “𐍅𐌰𐍄𐍉, 𐍅𐌰𐍄𐍉,” 𐍉𐌽 𐍄̈𐌹𐍄𐌴, 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍃𐌰𐌳𐌿𐌷𐍉𐌼 𐌼𐌿 𐌶̈𐍅𐌿𐍄̈𐌹 𐌿 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍃𐌿 𐌱𐍉𐌲𐍉𐍄𐌷𐌹𐍄̈𐌿, “𐍅𐌰𐍄𐍉𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽 𐌾𐌴 𐍀𐍂𐌰𐍅𐍉 𐌹 𐌶𐌰𐌺𐍉𐌽. 𐌷𐍅𐌰 𐍄̈𐌹𐍄𐌴 𐍃𐌰 𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽? 𐍉𐌽 𐌶̈𐌹𐍅𐌹. 𐌺𐍄𐍉 𐌿𐍃𐌻𐌿𐌺𐌹𐌳𐌴 𐍅𐌰𐌻𐍅𐌰𐍃 𐌱𐌴𐌶 𐌺𐌻𐌰𐍅𐌹𐍃𐌺𐌻𐌾𐌿𐍄̈𐌰? 𐌾𐌴 𐍄𐍉 𐍅𐍉𐌻𐌾𐌰𐌳𐌿𐌷𐍄̈, 𐌹𐌻𐌹 𐌾𐌴 𐍄𐍉 𐍂𐌿𐌺𐌰𐌷𐌰𐌽𐌳𐌰𐍃 𐍄̈𐍉𐍅𐌴𐌺𐌰, 𐌺𐍉𐍄𐍉𐍂𐌹̱ 𐌶̈𐌴𐌻𐌹 𐌼𐌹𐍂𐍆𐍂𐌹𐌸𐌰 𐌱𐌴𐌶 𐌼𐌴𐍂𐌴?”
“𐌷𐌴𐍂𐍂𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺, 𐍅𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌾𐌰𐌹 𐍄̈𐌹𐍄𐌿, 𐌶̈𐌴 𐍄𐍉 𐌱𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐍄̈𐍉𐍅𐌴𐌺 𐍉𐌳 𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽𐍃𐍄𐍂𐌰𐌽𐌴. 𐍉𐌽 𐌽𐍉𐍃𐌹𐌻 𐍃𐍄𐌰𐍂𐌹̱ 𐌱𐌹𐌽𐌳𐌰𐍂𐍃 𐌽𐌰 𐍂𐌰𐌼𐌴𐌽𐌴, 𐌹 𐌾𐌴𐌲𐍉 𐍉𐍄̈𐌹 𐌱𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐍄̈𐍂𐍅𐌴𐌽𐌴 𐌾𐌴𐌺𐌿𐍄𐌽𐌹̱ 𐍉𐌳 𐍂𐍉𐌳𐍅𐌴𐌹𐌽𐍃. 𐍉𐌽 𐌽𐌴 𐌱𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐍃𐌻𐌰𐍅𐌽𐌹𐌾𐌿𐌽𐌰𐌺, 𐌽𐌹 𐍅𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌾𐌰𐍃𐌻𐌿𐌲𐌰. 𐍉𐌽 𐌱𐌴𐌷̈𐌴 𐍆𐌹𐌻𐍉𐌶𐍉𐍆𐌺𐍂𐍉𐍄𐌺𐌹̱, 𐌺𐍉𐍄𐍉𐍂𐌹̱ 𐍅𐌹𐌳𐌴𐍃𐍄 𐌻𐌹𐌿𐌷𐍄𐌷𐌱𐌰𐌻𐌰𐌽𐍃 𐌹 𐌽𐌴 𐌲𐌰𐌼𐍉𐌶̈𐌴 𐌽𐍉𐍃𐌹𐍄.”
𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐍄𐌷𐌴𐍉𐍃𐍅𐌰𐌻𐌳𐍃 𐌱𐍉𐌻𐌴𐍃𐌻𐌰𐍅 𐍅𐌶𐌹𐌼𐌰 𐌶𐌻𐌰𐍄𐌽𐌿 𐌺𐌽𐌾𐌹𐌲𐌿𐍃𐌰 𐌹 𐍉𐍄𐌺𐍂𐌹𐍄𐍃𐌴 𐌽𐌰 𐍃𐍄𐍂𐌰𐌽𐌿 𐌳𐌴𐍄̈𐌲𐌴𐍂𐌰𐌱. “𐌽𐌰𐌷̈ 𐌶𐌰𐌺𐍉𐌽 𐌾𐌴 𐍀𐌹𐍃𐌰𐌻: 𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌽 𐍅𐌰𐌻𐍅𐌰𐍃 𐌽𐌴 𐍃𐍀𐌰𐌷𐌴𐌹𐍄, 𐌳𐍉𐌺 𐍂𐌴𐌹𐌺𐌳𐍉𐌼 𐌽𐌴 𐌲𐌰𐍄̈𐌹𐍄𐌴 𐍀𐍂𐌰𐍅𐌳𐌰𐍃𐌻𐍉𐍅𐍉𐌼. 𐌹𐌳𐌹 𐌹 𐌿𐌶𐌼𐌹 𐌼𐌿 𐌽𐌾𐌴𐌲𐍉𐍅 𐌱𐌹𐌽𐌳𐌰𐍂𐍃 𐌹 𐍅𐍂𐌰𐍄𐌹 𐌲𐌰 𐌽𐌰𐌶𐌰𐌳 𐍅 𐌽𐌰𐌷̈ 𐌳𐍉𐌼𐍀𐍉𐌻𐌹𐍃𐌲𐌰𐍂𐌳. 𐌹 𐍄̈𐌹𐍄𐌰𐍄 𐌼𐌿: 𐍃𐍅𐌴𐌹𐍄𐌻𐌹𐌿𐌷𐍃 𐍄𐌴 𐌲𐌻𐌴𐌳𐌰, 𐌽𐍉 𐌶̈𐌴𐌻𐌹 𐍄̈𐌹𐍃𐍄𐌿𐌼𐌴𐍂𐌿.”
𐌰 𐍄𐌰𐌺𐍉 𐍀𐍉𐌷̈𐌻𐌴 𐍃𐌴𐌽𐌰 𐍅𐌰𐍂𐌳𐌾𐌰, 𐌿𐌻𐍂𐌹̱𐌺 𐌺𐌻𐌴𐌽𐍉𐍅, 𐌽𐌴𐍃𐌿𐍄̈𐌹 𐌶𐌻𐌰𐍄𐌽𐌹̱ 𐌻𐌿𐌺𐌱𐌹𐌽𐌳𐌰𐍂 𐌹 𐌱𐍂𐍉𐌽𐌶𐌽𐌿 𐌼𐌴𐍄̈𐌶̈𐌴𐌻𐌴𐌶̈. 𐌹 𐌲𐌻𐌰𐍃𐌰𐌳𐌿𐌷𐍄̈ 𐍉𐌳 𐌱𐍉𐌲𐍄𐌷𐌴𐍉𐍃𐍅𐌰𐌻𐌳𐍃𐌰 𐍉𐍃𐍄𐌰𐍅𐌹 𐍃𐌰𐌼𐍉𐌲𐌰, 𐍃𐍄𐍉𐌾𐌴𐍄̈𐌹 𐌽𐌰 𐌼𐍉𐍃𐍄𐌿𐌱𐍂𐌿𐌲𐌲, 𐌽𐌰𐌳 𐍅𐍉𐍂𐌹𐌽𐌰𐍄𐍉𐌼, 𐌺𐌰𐌳𐌴 𐍅𐍉𐌳𐌰 𐍄𐌴𐍄̈𐌴 𐌱𐍂𐌶̈𐍉 𐌹 𐌽𐌴 𐍀𐍉𐌶̈𐌽𐌰𐌾𐌴 𐌲𐍂𐌰𐌽𐌹𐍄̈𐌴.

VIII.

SCENA I: LukjaKomora (The Lock Chamber)
DVA RINA I GERABSVET
(The Two Flows and the Light of Measure)
Vreme: 04:00 Nahts (Noć). Mesto: Centralna LukjaKomora Žilega Velehrad17. Svetlo od hvitalampa (white lamp) slabi. Watō (voda) rinne tiho.
PERSONAE	
KLAVIS MJERJA	Skriftsman (Scribe) za RegistarDom. On nosi rukskrift (handwriting, document).
JOHAN LUKJAČAR	Wardja (Guard) Stare Komore. Na njemu vidět blotomaska (mudmask).

(KLAVIS MJERJA stoji pri kamenu stolu, pod neonskim svejtmetalom. On drži pisanu afskribat (written report). JOHAN LUKJAČAR ulazi s sporim korakom.)
KLAVIS MJERJA (Govori s jasnym, trohaickim stressom)
Hveitliuhs tvoe, Wardja Johan. Qitem mi: sa walvas, što se zva Žilega17, uslukide bez mogprava? (. Mi imem GerabSvet! Mi imem PravdaLeitils! Tvoj afskribat qite: Nigasažem nigaznam. (.
JOHAN LUKJAČAR (Glas mu je težak, Liutiskmelodičan)
Gospodin Klavis, ja ne sažem vorda što ono nije. Ja fundem walvas uslukige, ja fundem rinn što beše rōþs (red). (. To ne beše rukahandas čoveka, to beše rinnduch. Watōrinn je pamet, no pamet ne voli klavissa.
KLAVIS MJERJA (Udari ščriftom po stolu. K, J, T zvuči kao Č, Ž, C, T)
Glupost! V Baurgta (the City) Rinn jest Zakon. Káko bude Baurgta imela mirfriþsa (the peace) ako svaki rinnduch sme da qite: “Ja se nigaznam!” Moj Genitivs kaže: čovek je otac delasa. Kde jest delo, tam mora da bude i otec!
JOHAN LUKJAČAR Otec se ne saihvat (is not seen). Vidzem samo tragsa. Trag rōþsweins, ot rinnta, što beše črvenisvet (redlight/signal). Ja uzatvorim walvas brzo, ugapečačatim (sealed it) s klavisom. No pre nego što gazatvorim, rinn mi šapne: “Ti ne haldast (hold) toksa. Tok (the flow) haldast tebe.”
KLAVIS MJERJA (Sedi, tiho skribajući)
Tok mora da bude zapisan, inače Tok nije. SlovoWaurd mora da bude nad WatōRinnom! Ja budem afskribat: “Walvas beše lukige (locked) po zakonu. Rinn beše rodweins (redwine) po grehu, i Wardjasa ugačistat Watō s rištom (justice).” Ovo jest nas ZakonDom. (This is our LawRule.)
JOHAN LUKJAČAR (Sklanja se) Ja budem čistit blotosa, ali svetoahus (holy spirit) nije pod našom kontrolom. Klavissa može da otvori lukjas. Ali BogWalds (Divine Ruler) otvori dušata.
(Klavis Mjerja nastavlja skribat bez pogleda. Johan Lukjačar izlazi u polutami. U daljini se čuje ritmično pumovát (pumping) iz Žilega.)
(KRÁJ)


SCENA II: SkriftsDom (The Registry House)
GERABBORG I BLOTRINNS
(The MeasureFortress and the BloodFlow)
Vreme: 06:30 Morgns (Jutro). Mesto: T’mna ArchīvKamra u Baurgta Praga. Svejtlo od klavisžarvija (keyfilament) slabi.
PERSONAE	
INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK	Scribe za Centralni Registar. (Agent of Documentation.)
ARCHIVGOTH AMAL	Čuvar SkriftsBōkōs (Keeper of the Archive Books).

(ARCHIVGOTH AMAL, star i sa crvenim očima, sedi za velikim stolom pod teškim, naslaganim starim knjigama (skriftsbōkōs). INSPEKTRŌR NOVAK ulazi, noseći tri uzorka vode u staklenim bočicama.)
NOVAK (Govori s brzim, administrativnim tonom) ArchivGoth, ja habem novu materiju. Watōsa iz Žilega. Ugavidi! (Perfective aspect: Look at this!). Watōrinn jest rōþs. Va 03:14 walvas na lukja Velehrad17 uslukide bez zapisa (opened without record). Tȟek rodweins ušel va ceremonialnu petlju.
AMAL (Ne diže pogled od pergamenata) Watō je watō. Gerab je gerab. Tvoja materija nimu dam rinn (it does not give me flow/meaning). Ona daje samo formu. Vrati watō nazad u rinn, i napiši Afskribat (Report). Sve što se događa, Rikarik knew, jest samo materija proper documentation.
NOVAK Ali to nije nepravilni tȟek (irregular flow). Straža najde spaurōs (traces) na bruggs: krv ili vino—ni jasno. Ja proverem skriftsbōkōs; nihvat missada (nothing missing/gone wrong). Ake klawis framahalds (reserve key) nedostaje. Dva saihwande (witnesses) qaþun: “Voda govorila imena”.
AMAL (Sada podiže glavu, držeći starý rukskrift) Watō qitat (says) namōs? Voda, sēna (that) je WatōWatō, a WatōWatō ne bi mogal govoriti, dok Slovowaurd ne gaprobudi. Ti qites mi o missorinnja (misflow). Ja vidzem Simbol. U anālima Velehradenses piše: “Kada rinn rōþs weins afidde, togda BogWalds skabida hveitwatō.”
NOVAK To jest samo stara saga. Mi imeme Gerab (Measure). Mi imeme Zakon (Law). Watō mora da bude hveit (white) po zakonu. Walva mora da bude zatvorny (closed/sealed). Tko uze klawis?
AMAL Možet biti da je čovek. Onaj mirčelovek (peaceman) što uslukide (opened, PFV) walvas, on nije želil da budem zapisan. On želi mirfriþ (peacefriþ) bez mere. Ja ugačitam tvój afskribat: “upirs administrativni” (administrative ghost/undead).
NOVAK Ja budem tražit čoveka, a nibudem tražit duhsa (I will seek the man, not the spirit). Ja budem ganađe i gazatvori (PFV future). Rinn mora da bude pod Gerabom (Flow must be under Measure).
AMAL (Zatvara knjigu. Glas mu postaje proročanski) Slovowaurd prinosi na stoldomu jeden hleb dvoje koreni. Idi, Inspektrōr Novak, i nađi tog čoveka namōslausans (nameless one). Ali ako ga nađeš, ugapitaj: “Kto si ti? Kto piše tvoj Slovowaurd?”
(Novak odmahuje glavom, uzima uzorke watō i izlazi, a zvuk pumovát (pumping) iz Žilega se pojača.)
(KRÁJ SCENE II)


SCENA III: VitaGerab (The LifeMeasure Office)
MATERTELO I SMĚRT BEZ PISA
(The MatterBody and Death Without Record)
Vreme: 07:00 Morgns. Mesto: Mala VitaGerab Kamra (Audit Chamber of Life) u Praga Rehte. Prostor je hladan, ispunjen metalom i formalinom.
PERSONAE	
INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK	Scribe za Centralni Registar. (Angry, determined.)
DR. LIRA KELAJ	Repose Tehničarka (Repose Technician) za Ministarstvo Vode. (Pragmatic, scientific.)

(INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK čeka u hladnoj sobi. DR. LIRA KELAJ ulazi, noseći malu listu u rukama. Ona nosi čistu, belu radnu odeću, ali su joj ruke blago zamazane uljem.)
NOVAK (Visoki Gothoslavic, naglasak na Gerab)
Dr. Kelaj. Ja sam Novak. Došao sam po materijasa. WatōRinn na Žilega17 beše rōþs (red). Tȟek se uzaustavi (was stopped), i v 04:30 medicinski vagon ugauvede čovek bez papiros. Gde jest materija?
KELAJ (Liutiskton, ravnodušno)
Novak. MirČelovek leži va mračnikamri. Njegovo telotelo je ovde. Ali materijasa (the matter/data) nije. Mi imeme samo kratak skrifts: “Čovek beše xladan (cold), veinss neživi (unliving). Nema namōssa (name). Nema čipa (chip). Nema zakonsa.”
NOVAK (Zastane. Govori sa administratifnom arogancijom)
Nema zakona? Svi su ljudi pod našim Lex Amalarica, pod Slovowaurdom! Káko može telo da beše bez zakona? Káko mi budem pisal missorinnja (misflow/irregularity) ako ja nigaznam ime oca delasa? Ovo jest nedokumentovana vitalnost! Znašu li ti, da evil jest nepravilno pisana vitalnost?.
KELAJ (Pogleda ga s blagim prezrenjem)
Ja ne skrībujem evil, Novak. Ja skrībujem samo ferro (iron) i watō. Čoveksa imel stop u srcu. Ja ugačitam krvsa; nije blot (blood), nije weins (wine). To je crna voda. Onaj tok (flow) što ugačuješ u WatōRinnu—to je samo mehanika. On ušel je (he entered, PFV) va lukja, i on gaostavide (left it, PFV). Ja skrībujem rezultat, ne pričinas (the cause).
NOVAK (Istrgne iz džepa klawisknijgu—the keybook)
Klavissa nedostaje! Onaj ključ što ugaotvori walvas (valve) do rōþs weins! Mora da jest on. Moramo da ga pitam: Kde jest klawis?
KELAJ Ti ne gapitam ništa. On nigaodgovori. Njegova smrt nije pisana (His death is not recorded) jer mi ne imeme gerab (measure) za to. Ja ne vidzem duha ni tela. Ja vidzem samo failūra zapisa (failure of the record).
NOVAK (Odlazi prema vratima, držeći klawisknijgu čvrsto.) Tij si samo tehnik. Ja sam Scribe. Ja budem nađe (find, PFV) ime za failūrasa!
KELAJ Idi. I pazi: Watō te čeka.
(Novak izlazi, a Lira Kelaj se okreće nazad svom stolu. U tišini se čuje kliktaje releja—releaklix—iz obližnjeg analog logic enginea, potvrđujući da, iako je čovek nestao, Registar radi.)
(KRÁJ SCENE III)

SCENA IV: Katacombōs (The Catacombs)
SPAURŌS I RINNSTǶEK
(Traces and the Irregular Flow)
Vreme: 07:45 Morgns (Jutro). Mesto: T’mna KatacombōMeþal (Dark CatacombMetal). Prvi podnivo pod Centralnom Lukja Velehrad17. Svetlo Novakove hvitalampe drhti nad mokrim Watōskalu (waterscale).
PERSONAE	
INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK	Scribe za Centralni Registar.
JOHAN LUKJAČAR	Wardja (Guard) Stare Komore.

(Watō kapje tiho. Zvuk pumovát (pumping) je glasan i rezonantan. JOHAN LUKJAČAR nosi dugu bronznu lēitilsžicu (inspectionrod). Novak prati WatōRinn na steni.)
NOVAK (Čita sa zida, gde je blato)
Watō ugačitam. Watō qite da u 04:02 WatōRinn beše hveit (white) i zatvorny (closed/sealed). Ali tamo gore, Watō beše rōþs (red). Tȟek se zove missorinnja. Rinn što nije pisal.
JOHAN LUKJAČAR (Pokazuje na malu, tamnu rupu)
Inspektrōr Novak, sa rupa jest Watōtok, sēna (that) gori hveitwatō. Ali na ovoj steni, ja vidzem spaurōs. Ne spaurōs čoveka, no spaurōssa od Watōducha. Voda nigagovori imena bez jezika, dok on nije smĕrtduch (deathspirit).
NOVAK (Lampa mu sija direktno u oči, odbija folklor)
Smĕrt jest samo nedokumentovana vitalnost. Ti tražiš duhsa; ja tražim klawis framahalds. Káko bi upir ušel u walvas bez klawissa? Tko otvori, mora da ima ključ. Tko ima ključ, mora da beše pisal!
(Novak klekne i pomera kamen u Watōretliu (waterlining/canal lining). Ispod kamena, leži bronzani ključ, ali je prislonjen na malu, osušenu kost.)
JOHAN LUKJAČAR (Uplašen)
Tu je! Klawissa! Ali zašto je gapoložil na kost? To nije Gerab (Measure)!
NOVAK (Uzima ključ, ignorirajući kost. Ključ ima ugraviran mali "R17".)
Ovo je Gerab. Zakon. Klawis je ovde. Rukahandas što ugapoložil (placed it, PFV) ključ ovde beše rukahandas što je ugazatvoril walvas gore. Delo je pisal.
(Novak skribuje brzo u svoj škriftsbōk (writingbook).
JOHAN LUKJAČAR Ali on želi da mi znamo. On želi da Gerab videst (sees) da WatōRinn ima mādēlos (baddeeds).
NOVAK Ne. On želi upirsa (the administrative ghost) da beše videst. On želi da ja pišem pričata (the story). (Podigne ključ, koji je hladan.) Klawis je pronađen. Ali Gerab traži više od ključa. Vratimo se. Ja budem tražit tog namōslausans (nameless one). Ako on nigapiše, ja budem pisal za njega. Ja budem nađe njegovo ime.
(Novak uspravno korača iz KatacombōKamre. Johan LukjaČar sledi, drhteći, gledajući za sobom u WatōRinn.)
(KRÁJ SCENE IV)

SCENA V: NomōsDom (The Name Registry)
KLAVIS I NOMŌSLAUSANS
(The Key and the Nameless One)
Vreme: 08:30 Morgns. Mesto: Centralny Registar NamōsDom (Central Registry House of Names). Zidovi su prekriveni pisanim nomerlistami (census lists). Tinte i pečati su na stolu. Miris starog papira i žilegaulja (canal oil).
PERSONAE	
INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK	Scribe za Centralni Registar. (Drži ključ i kost.)
LETPISAR ALARIC	Čuvar NomerListsa (Keeper of the Census List). (Strogi birokrat.)

(LETPISAR ALARIC, čovek pedesetih, nosi na glavi srebrni obruč (silver circlet) sa ugrađenim mermetalom. On okreće ogromnu knjigu Nomōssa.)
NOVAK (Bacajući bronzani klawis R17 na pisaćem stolu)
LetPisar! Tvoj GerabDom (MeasureRule) beše prav. Klawis se nađe. Materija (the evidence) jest ovde. Ali Nomōs (the name) je nigaznam. Tȃ čovek što môrde (died) bez pisana, on uze ovaj klawis. Slušaj môj Afskribat (Report): Watōrinn beše rōþs; Watō qite imena.
ALARIC (Govori u čistom Bogothicu, bez Slavske mekoće, prateći prstom listu.)
Inspektrōr. Klawissa R17 pripada Lukja Žilega Velehrad17. Otvaranje je bilo u 03:14. Ja ugaproverim naš RechtRegistar (Right/Law Register). Walvas beše otvoren neodljudi. Nema zapis za Operariusa u tom času. Vrata se uzatvore, WatōRinn se ugaispisao. Ali tko je gaotkrio?
NOVAK Mrtviživi čovek! Telotelo što leži va VitaGerab. Ali on ima klawissa. Stavi klawis u nomerlist! Gde jest njegov čip? Gde jest njegova adresa? Ja budem da ga pišem!
ALARIC (Pomerajući papire. U pogledu mu se vidi hladna užasnutost.)
Inspektrōr Novak, slušaj. Klawissa je realan (real). Materijasa je realna. Ali Nomōssa nije. Ja imam nomerlist za sve Civic Goths (Građane). Postoji list Nomōsslausans (Nameless Register). To je list nedokumentovane vitalnosti. I ja fundem u Lists 17: JedanČovekBezBroj. On mora da bude on.
NOVAK (Zgrabi list, ali ne vidi ništa osim prazne linije.)
Ništa! Nema imena, nema posla, nema oca, nema majke, nema Gerabsa! Káko može Bogothian da beše čovekbezbroj?!
ALARIC (Sklanjajući list natrag.) Tȏ jest naša Tragedijasa, Novak. Postoje ljudi što ne želevše da reckon correctly (da računaju pravo). Oni su reversali (Reversals). Oni hoće mirfriþ bez Slovowaurdom. On je bio pisal samo da nije pisal. Njegova vitalnost je bila samo negativan zapis.
NOVAK (Udara pesnicom po stolu, uzdrmavajući Alarica.)
Ja budem ganađe! (I will find him, PFV future). Ja budem gapiše! (I will write him!) On ne može umrit (die) bez da ima Gerab! Lex Amalarica (The Law of Amaleric) ne trpi prazan zapis. On želi da ja nađem njegov Slovowaurd!
ALARIC (Vraća se pisanju, ignorirajući Novaka.) Traži. No pazi: tȟek (the flow) teče prema tebi. WatōRinn (The Water Flow) jest nepravilni. I nepravilni ne da se pisati.
(Novak uzima klawis i odmahuje glavom, napuštajući Centralny Registar. Oseća se težina neizmerljivog neuspeha u svetu izgrađenom na merenju.)
(KRÁJ SCENE V)




SCENA VI: DomVyrval (The Chamber of Weights)
GERABSYNOD I WATŌBLOT
(The MeasureSynod and the WaterBlood)
Vreme: 08:30 Morgns. Mesto: T’mna Kamra DomVyrval. Velika, okrugla prostorija sa metalnim obručima i staklenim manometrima na zidovima. U centru, za stolom od opsidiana, sedi SYNODMAGISTER LUKAS.
| PERSONAE | | | : | : | | INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK | Scribe za Centralni Registar. (Frustriran, drži ključ R17.) | | SYNODMAGISTER LUKAS | Glavni Čuvar Vage i Merila (Keeper of Weights and Measures). |

(SYNODMAGISTER LUKAS sedi mirno, u beloj togi, proučavajući Novakove skriftslisty (report sheets). INSPEKTRŌR NOVAK stoji, klawis R17 leži na stolu pored lista Nomōsslausans (The Nameless Register).)
NOVAK (Govori brzo, sa Liutisk intonacijom, punom Gotiske gramatike)
SynodMagister. Klawis je fundidan (found, past participle). Vračam ga u NomōsDom. To nije missowatō (bad water). Tȃ čovek što ga ugapoložil (placed it, PFV) na kostsa, on je živel. VitaGerab ga ugačitam (read, PFV) mrtvim, ali NomōsDom ga ugapiše (wrote, PFV) nepostojećim. Káko mi budem imeli Gerab (Measure) ako imemo čovekbezbroj što uslukide (opened, PFV) ZakonWatō?
LUKAS (Podiže glavu. Glas mu je miran i strog, kao pisani zakon.)
Inspektrōr Novak. Tvoj Afskribat jest čitan (read, PP). Tvoja materija jest merjena (measured, PP). Slovowaurd jest PravdaDom (Rule of Truth). Tȟek se ugačistat. Walvas je zatvorny. Tvoj NomōsDom nigapiše (does not write, PFV) to ime, i ako NomōsDom nigapiše, onda to ime nigajest (does not exist, PFV). Telo je samo matertelo(matterbody), ali Gerab jest duch.
NOVAK (Pokazuje na ključ.)
Ovo je klawis framahalds (reserve key). On je ukraden iz ormarsa! To jest prekršenje (breach) Zakona, nije teorija! Čovek što môrde (died), on želede (wanted) da mu Gerab vidi da on nije pisal (was not written) njegovu smert (death). On želi da mi ga pišemo!
LUKAS (Gleda Novaka sa studenom dozom discipline.)
Ti tražiš reversalisa (the reversal/rebel). Ti tražiš rinnduch (flowspirit). Ja tražim firmness (čvrstinu). Naš ZakonDom je Slovowaurd, i on mora da beše (must be) iznad WatōRinnta. Ako Watō qite (says) imena, Watō lāže. Samo skriftsbōk (writing book) qite svetliuhs (lighttruth). Tvoj Afskribat budem (will be) ugapisal ovako: “Klawis R17 beše izvan Gerabta, no v WatōRinnu nigabeše nepravilni tȟek”. Mi budem očistit blotosa (the mud) s Logikom.
NOVAK (Zgrabi ključ R17 i kost s NomōsListta, uzmučen.)
Tij si ugačistat Watō s Logikom, ja budem gačistit s ferro (iron). Ja budem ganađe (I will find him, PFV) u svetu, ako ga niganađe (PFV negative) u NomōsDomu! Ja budem pisal njegovo ime.
LUKAS (Lukas se smješi, hladno.)
Idi, Inspektrōr Novak. Ali budi siguran: Ti budem našel samo eho (echo). Ne zaboravi: Smrt bez pisana jest samo nepravilni eho.
(Novak izlazi. Lukas skida svoje mermetal (measuremetal) na stolu. Iz zida se čuje glasno, stabilno pumpovát (pumping) WatōRinnta, potvrđujući da je Gerab uvek na mestu.)
(KRÁJ SCENE VI)

SCENA VII: NomōsSlovens (The NamingSpeech)
RINNMÔRDS I SKRIPTSDOM
(The FlowMurder and the WritingRule)
Vreme: 09:00 Morgns. Mesto: VitaGerab Kamra. Inspektrōr Novak se vraća, držeći u ruci klawis R17 i mali kamen s kostsa. DR. LIRA KELAJ čisti metalni sto. Atmosfera je sterilna i hladna.
| PERSONAE | | | : | : | | INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK | Scribe za Centralni Registar. | | DR. LIRA KELAJ | Repose Tehničarka. |

(DR. LIRA KELAJ završava sa čišćenjem Watōčelika. Novak stoji čvrsto, klawis u jednoj, kost u drugoj ruci.)
NOVAK Dr. Kelaj. Ja ugaimam (I have, PFV) klawis. Sēna (that) što nedostaje (is missing) u NomōsDomu (Name Registry) je ovde. Našao sam ga va katacombōs (catacombs), položil na kostsa. Tȟek (the flow) je pisal (written). Telotelo mora da ima Nomōs (Name).
KELAJ (Ne podiže pogled.)
Materija je nigaznam (unknown/not known, PFV). Ja ugačitam srcta (the heart). Ja ugačitam krvsa (the blood). Krv beše crna voda, ni blot, ni weins. Klawis otvara walvas (valve). On ne otvara dušata (the soul). Tvoj Slovowaurd(WordWord, Logos) niganađe (does not find, PFV) tog čoveka.
NOVAK (Stavi ključ na sto, pored Novakove Skriftsbōk (writing book). Drži kost.)
SynodMagister qite, da Nomōsslausans (Nameless One) jest samo nepravilni eho (irregular echo) [VI]. Ali eho jest živi glas što se ugavratil nazad! On želede (wanted) da Gerab (Measure) ugavidi da on nigajest pisal! On je RinnDuch(FlowSpirit)!
KELAJ Ako on nije pisal, onda on nigajest. Zakon je Lex Amalarica, Novak. Tij želiš da ga pišeš u nomerlist. Ali nema ničega da se piše. Nomōs mora da bude merjen (measured).
NOVAK (Bes mu je miran i administrativan. On otvara svoju knjigu—Skriftsbōk—i uzima pero.)
Ja budem gapiše (I will write him, PFV future). Ako on nigaima oca, ja budem njegov otac. Ako NomōsDom nigaima broj, ja budem gapisal kód. (Piše polako, formalnim Bogothicom.)
Ime: Namōslausans (The Nameless One). Uzrok smerti: Ugažrtvoval (sacrificed himself, PFV) za nepravilni tȟek.Broj: Klavissa R17Kost (Key R17 Bone). Gerab: Mjerjen (Measured) u 09:00 Morgns, 18. Martus (Month).
KELAJ (Posmatra ga, zatim blago klimne glavom.)
Ti si pisal (written, PP) prazan zapis.
NOVAK (Zatvara knjigu čvrsto, uz zvuk metala. Glas mu je iscrpljen, ali trijumfalan.)
Ne. Ja uganapisal (I wrote, PFV) sam Slovowaurd. Gerab jest spašen (saved). (Uzima ključ i kost, ostavljajući ih na stolu.) Sada, Dr. Kelaj, ti budem ugauzela (you will take, PFV future) klawis i kost, i budem ugapisala (you will write, PFV future) ih u tvoj logbook kao Materijasa Nula.
(Novak izlazi, noseći svoju Skriftsbōk. Dr. Kelaj uzima klawis R17 i kost, stavi ih na vagu, ali skala se ne pomera, ostajući na nuli. Ona se blago nasmeši i počinje da piše u svoj logbook. Iz daljine se i dalje čuje ritmično, nezaustavljivo pumpovát WatōRinnta.)
(KRÁJ SCENE VII)

SCENA VIII: ArhīvSvetDom (The ArchiveLightHouse)
EHO BEZ VORDA I SVETSKRIFTS
(The Echo Without a Word and the Holy Writings)
Vreme: 09:15 Morgns. Mesto: ArhīvKamra Velehrad. Visoka, hladna soba. Na stolovima su razbacane teške skriftsbōkōs (writing books) i pergamenati. ARCHIVGOTH AMAL pregleda Annales Velehradenses.
| PERSONAE | | | : | : | | INSPEKTRŌR EMIL NOVAK | Scribe za Centralni Registar. (Njegova Skriftsbōk je sada zatvorena.) | | ARCHIVGOTH AMAL | Čuvar SkriftsBōkōs. |

(AMAL sedi, držeći u rukama Annuāli. Novak ulazi i stoji iznad njega. Sunce sija kroz uske prozore, osvetljavajući prašinu i tintu.)
NOVAK ArchivGoth. Ja sam uganapisal (I have written, PFV) [VII]. Klawis (key) i kost (bone) su va VitaGerab, merjeni i ugapisani (recorded, PFV) kao Materijasa Nula. NomōsDom (Name Registry) je čist (clean). SynodMagister je ugaprihvatal (accepted, PFV) môj Afskribat (Report) [VI]. Gerab (Measure) je spašen.
AMAL (Amal zatvara Annuāli, ne gledajući Novaka.) Gerab se uvek ugaspasit. Gerab jest aeternus (eternal), Novak. Ali šta sa WatōRinn? WatōRinn nigagovori (does not speak) imena bez jezika, dok on nije smĕrtduch (deathspirit) [IV]. Ti si ugazatvoril (closed, PFV) praznu rupu u Zakonu. Ali tȃ prazna rupa nije bila stvorena (created) da beše prazna.
NOVAK Ja uganapisal Nomōssa. On jest Namōsslausans (The Nameless One). On jest pisal u môjoj skriftsbōk [VII]. Tȃ eho (echo) se ugaumiride (was silenced, PFV).
AMAL (Amal uzima prašnjavu knjigu gotičke filozofije.) Môj Slovowaurd (WordWord) qite: Liuhthispravda (LightTruth) ne trpi tihieho (silent echo). Eho što se uganapisal je najglasniji eho. Onaj Nomōsslausans nije želel vitasa(the life) po Gerabu. On želel smert (death) što nigabeše pisana. Ti si mu ugauzeo (took, PFV) njegovu želju.
NOVAK (Novak gleda na klawis R17, koji sada nije s njim [VII].) Ja sam ugačinio (I have done, PFV) što Zakon ugazahteva (demands, PFV). Moja volja (will) beše čista.
AMAL Tvoja volja ugapisala (wrote, PFV) to ime. A to ime nigabeše (did not exist, PFV) dok ti ga niganapisal. Gde jest Nomōs (Name), tamo jest Pravda (Truth). Ti si stvoril (created) nepravilni zapis, da bi spasio pravilni Registar. Ti si čoveksa (the man) što ugačistat blotosa (the mud) s Logikom [VI].
(Amal spušta pogled i prelazi prstom preko stare gotičke rune u knjizi.)
AMAL Idi, Inspektrōr Novak. Ti si Gerabsin (Son of Measure). Ti si uganapisal Smert (Death). Sada moraš da živiš sa tȃm pisanim imenom u tvoe srcu. Zapamti: Slovowaurd mora da bude calm, lucid, almost Stoic. Tvoj afskribat je fervent (vruć). Watō te čeka [VII].
(Novak klimne glavom. On ne uzima Nomōslist. On se okreće i izlazi, a zvuk pumovát WatōRinnta (The Pumping of the WaterFlow) ga prati, sada u ritmu koji je Novak uspostavio. On zna da je Nomōsslausans sada deo njega.)
(FINIS)


IX.

AFSKRIBA BI IK, GUDJA ALARIK (A SelfRecord by Me, Priest Alarik)
Ik, Gudja Alarik, ja sem Skriftsmansa in TemplaDomus ana Lukja Velehrad17. Moja dužnost jest mjerživot (measurelife), i moja služba jest pisal Zakon.
I. O Dužnosti i Mjeri (Of Duty and Measure)
Ja sam Civik Goth, ugapisal [VII] pod ZakonDom Lex Amalarica. Moje živottelo jest posvećen (consecrated) Gerabu [VII] i Slovowaurdu [VII]. SynodMagister [VI] nam ugauči (teaches, PFV) da "biti Bogothian jest reckon correctly". Ne tražim voljasa (will) [VII], no tražim IstinaGerab [VII]. Služim BogWalds va Bogothicu, jeziku svetliuhs i Liuhthbalanssa. Moj glas je eho [VI] što mora da beše čist i jasan kao srebrna cijev (silver pipe).
II. O Jeziku i Knjizi (Of Language and the Book)
Naša templa služi ne samo Guþu, no služi i WatōRinnu. Ja ugačitam (read, PFV) Afskribatsa što dolazi iz Kanalkánstva (Canal Bureaucracy). Moja zadaća je ugapisal [VII] sve tȟekove (flows):
• Kada se walvas ugaotvori (opens, PFV) za tokwatō [VII];
• Kada bindars se ugazatvori (closes, PFV) kriz lukja.
Ove tehničke reči jesu Gothickoreni, i ja ih branim od Slavicmora. Ja koristim Gothicleksa za autoritet, a Latin za teološki mirfriþ.
III. O Ahus i Domu (Of Spirit and Rule)
Môj ahusduch (spiritghost) je ugamiran (calm, PFV) [VI] jer znam da svaki skriftsbōk [VII] jest merjen [VII]. Nema smert bez pisana [VII]. Ako je smert [VII] nepravilni eho [VI], onda ja, Gudja Alarik, budem [VII] pisal vordsa (the word) da eho beše ugazatvoril (silenced, PFV) [VII]. Ja sam sin Gerabta [VI], a moj Dom je tamo, kade Slovowaurd i Gerab ugastoje zajedno.
FINIS SKRIFTI.


X.

This folk tale is written in High Bogothic (Modern Standard Bogothic, MSB), the formal, codified language of the administration, which served as the liturgical and technical register for centuries. The narrative blends the emotionality of Slavic folklore (the upir) with the Bogothian governing philosophy of Measure, Record, and FaithinMeasure.
The tale is rendered in a highly technical, archival tone, reflecting the origin of such stories: Allegory disguised as an Incident Report.

Pôvest o WalwaRinnsa i Upirs Žilega
(The Tale of the ValveFlow and the Upir of the Conduit)
I. Skriftsman in WatōDom (The Scribe in the Water House)
Va tihiveče nahts, kade Rinn beše spor i hveita, Skriftsman Jovan Theuda, sin Theudas, sedi v svoem Žileg domu. On ugadržet svoj Skriftsbōk i čita statuut o Rinntoksa (the flowthroughput). U Bogothiji, tok mora da bude ugamerjen (measured, PFV), jer chaos ugavrati (will return, PFV).
Watō se ugasluša kao slovowaurd, ali v to noć Watō imaše glas što nigabeše pisal.
Jovan ugačita zapis na manometru: WatōGerab (WaterMeasure) ugaspasit (is saved, PFV). Ali u srcu on ugavidetda Gerab nije potpun.
II. Nepravilni Tȟek (The Irregular Flow)
Va 03:00 nahts, sats ugakuca (struck, PFV) čis’tu meru. Johan ustane i ugaidet dole do Lukja Velehrad17. Tam’ on ugafundet da je walvas (the valve) uslukide unsatjan (unlawfully/unscheduled). To beše missorinnja—flow that has missed its schedule.
Ne beše blot (blood) ni weins (wine), no beše crna voda, što miriše na stari strah i nepravilni zapis.
Jovan se ugasećat Slovowaurdsa: "Evil jest improperly documented vitality".
Va WatōRinnu stoji smertduch, Namōsslausans (Nameless one), Upir, što beše ugahladan i bez Geraba. Upir nigaqite (does not speak, PFV) vordsa. On samo ugagledet Jana.
III. Pisanje RinnDucha (Writing the FlowSpirit)
Jovan nigakoristi (does not use, PFV) ferro (iron) ni sol (salt). On ugakoristi Skrift. On izvadi iz džepsa svoj skriftsbōk, pisan Silver Scriptom (Bogothic minuscule).
On ugapitam Upirsa:
Jovan Hva je tvoj Nomōs (Name)? Kde jest tvoj Gerab?
Upir (Šapat kao zvučni tok vode u cijevi) Nigaimam Nomōs. Ja sem Eho što ugavrati (returns, PFV). Ja sem Watō što neželi da beše merjen.
Jovan se ugasetit (remembers, PFV) Lex Amalarica: "Smert bez pisana jest samo nepravilni eho".
On ugauzme klawis R17 (the key) što leži na stolu Lukjata. Jovan ugapiše direktno u skriftsbōk:
“Ja, Skriftsman Jovan Theuda, ugamerjam tȟek (flow) Upirsa. Njegov Nomōs jest Nomōsslausans R17Kost [VII] (Nameless One, Key17Bone). Njegova dužnost je ugazatvorit (to close, PFV) walvasa. Ugazatvori!”
IV. Kraj i Gerabsa (End and the Measure)
Slovowaurd (The written word of order) beše uganapisal (written, PFV). Upir nigamože da ostane. Smertduch se ugapovlači (retreated, PFV), vraćajući se u crnu vodu.
Jovan ugazatvori walvasa. WatōRinn ugateče ponovo hveit i čist.
On se ugavrati u dom i uganapiše afskribat, govoreći: "Missorinnja beše ispravljeno. Gerab je ugaodržan."
Tako Bogothia ugapobedet kaos—ne s molitvom, već sa preciznom dokumentacijom. Lexas wa uurdi uuzapisnita bi rinnu (The Law of the Word has been perfectly recorded by the flow).
(FINIS POVĒSTI)


XI.

POVĒST FUNDARICUS BOGOTHIAE: GLAS RINNSA I SLOVOWAURD
(The Tale of the Founding of Bogothia: The Voice of the Flow and the WordWord)
I. Fuga et Fraktura Vorda (The Flight and the Fracture of the Word)
Va tihiveče Smerti Rikja Romana, kade passionsa (passion) beše uganadjačala (overcame, PFV) Gerabsa (Measure), Guthans pod Amalaricussa beše ugafuga (fled, PFV) od NiceneHerese.
Na Svētom Kōnčilu Nicaea (Holy Council of Nicaea), SinuCristussa—WordLogos—beše ugaudaren (struck, PFV) od Rukas Strasti (Hand of Passion). I togda Slovowaurd (WordWord) ugamenil (changed, PFV), i ugapovlačil (withdrew, PFV) LiuhthisPravda (LightTruth) na Nordsa (the North), želedeći [VII] sibns (peace) i balans.
Tȃ fugasa (the flight) ne beše poraz (defeat), no beše Exodus za ArianTriggwa (Arian Faith).
II. WatōZemja i Bohogothicu (WaterEarth and the Bohogothic)
Amalaricussa, ReikTheoswalds (KingGodRuler), ugadonosio (brought, PFV) trilingualni paket (trilingual package) — Gothic (snaga/power), Latin (zakon/law), i ArianTriggwa — va BohoBasin (Bohemian Basin). Tu uganađe (found, PFV) Sklavōs, narodljudь što živeše od pole (field) i Watō (water).
GothicElita beše ugavidela (saw, PFV) prestige gradientsa: Gothic za krv i vlast (authority); Slavic za zemja i rad (labor).
Kroz dvije generacije, WatōRinnsa naroda ugastvoril (created, PFV) Bohogothicu— creole što beše Gothickoreni ali Slavicglas.
III. Lexa Solis Mjerjenog (The Law of the Measured Sun)
Thiudangard Bogotjan (Kingdom of Bogothia) ugaosnovano (was established, PFV) na principu da smert [VII] i život jesu samo materija ispravna dokumentacija.
• Zakonsa (The Law) beše ugapisal (written, PFV): "To be Bogothian jest reckon correctly".
• Templa Solis (Church of the Sun) ugauči (taught, PFV): Ordo (order) jest divinus.
• Watō beše ugasubdūdat (subdued, PFV) pod rationalni metod.
Tako Bogothia ugapostavljala (set itself up, PFV) kao treći stub (third pillar)—Bureaukratija što ugaveruet (believes, PFV). Slovowaurd ugapobedi (conquered, PFV) chaos ne s Blot (blood), no s Gerab.
(FINIS MYTHOS BOGOTHICUS)

XII.

eins, dui, trij, fidur, fimf, sais, sibun, ahtō, niun, tehun, ainlif, twalif, trijtehun, fidurtehun, fimftehun, saistehun, sibuntehun, ahtōtehun, niuntehun, dui tigjus, trij tigjus, fidur tigjus, fimf tigjus, sais tigjus, sibuntehund, ahtōtêhund, niuntêhund, taihuntehund, twa hunda, þrija hunda, fimf hunda, niun hunda, þûsundi.

XIII.
DE BERGSSUGSANAMENSURA
Inspektrōr Lukas Klawis ugaskriba: Kroz Hradyluka hveita granica uiddja,. T Bergszugsa (the mountain range) jest fidur tehon miljo dloga, i on ugastoje granica izmed Theudōs i nas Thiudangardsa,.
Videl jsem excessorthodoxy geološke materije. Skala tam’ ugapokazet fraþi (understanding) bez Gerabta (Measure). Tamo gore, gde Nicene (Nicene) Dukōs (Dukes) uganarode (rule), nigajest rationalnisistem.
Watōrinn (Waterflow) ide bez walvasa (valve), i cestasa (roads) beše haphazard. Tȃ krajina (region) ugaradi SorboGothic (SorboGothic) creole, čija lingua (tongue) beše ugainfiltrirana (infiltrated, PFV) od SilverGothic (Silver Gothic) arondsa (administration),. Oni uzaime skriftsa, no sadržaj (content) nije naš.
Mi, Bogoths, držime da Gerab ugastoji svetliuhs (lighttruth) to zemjagardsa (homeland). Tamo, va Saxony, pravo (law) jest muddy (bloto), [IV]. Ordo (order) jest eho [VI] što nigamože se ugaslušati [VI]. Mi smo conscience Europe.
FINIS AFSKRIBA

XIV.
Afskribat Gerabta: Pôvest o Neizmerjenom Srebrnom Rinnu Severa
(Report of the Measure: The Tale of the Unmeasured Silver Flow of the North) ArchivGoth, VitaGerab Audit Chamber, Praga Rehte Inspektrōr Lukas Klawis ugaskriba
I. Materija Sine Gerabta (Matter Without Measure)
Naša templa služi WatōRinnu (Our temple serves the Water Flow). Mi, Bogoths, držime da Gerab ugastoji svetliuhs (We, Goths, hold that Measure is lighttruth) to zemjagardsa (to the homeland).
Iz Skriftsbōka (the Scribe Book) iz Bergssugsanamesura (Measure of the Mountain Range), mi ugaznam (we know) da tamo gore, gde Nicene Dukōs uganarode, nigajest rationalnisistem (Up there, where Nicene Dukes rule, there is no rational system). Njihov Ordo (order) jest eho što nigamože se ugaslušati (Their order is an echo that cannot be heard).
Ova povēst (tale) opisuje kako Chaos uganođe (found) SilverRinn (Silver Flow) u zemlji zvanoj Saxony, kade Watōrinn ide bez walvasa (where the Water Flow goes without a valve).
II. Watō Fuhrman i Srebrni Nalaz (Water Carter and the Silver Find)
Va 1169. godini (In the year 1169), u staroj hronici ugazapisano (it was written down), da Fuhrleute iz Halle (Carters from Halle), što nesu Sol (salt) od Reka Salza (Salt River) kriz Markgrafschaft Meissen (through the March of Meissen) k’Bohemia, uganađe Silver.
Oni ugazgube (they lost) pravu cestasa (the right roads) i ugazalutaju (they strayed) na nevažne puteve (unimportant paths). Tamo, kde Räder (wheels) njihovi Wagen (wagons) ugaseku (cut) zemlju, jedno Gestein (rock) se ugajavi (one rock appeared).
Ovo Gestein beše glanzend (shining)—a kada ga ugatestira (they tested it) va Goslaru—beše bauwürdiges Silbererz (worthwhile silver ore).
Ovo uganođe ne beše plod Lexa Solis Mjerjenog (This finding was not the fruit of the Law of the Measured Sun). Ne beše ispravna dokumentacija. To beše náhoda (chance/accident), to jest, nepravilno pisana vitalnost (undocumented vitality). WatōRinn jest nepravilni (The Water Flow is irregular).
Gudja Alarik (Priest Alarik) ugaveruet (believes): Srebro je ugatočeno (was poured) u zemlju ne s Gerabom, no s Chaosom (not with Measure, but with Chaos).
III. Posledice Nedokumentovane Vitalnosti (Consequences of Undocumented Vitality)
Kada reči o Silberu ugaputuju (traveled) na sve strane (everywhere), ugazačinju (it started) Völkerwanderung (migration of peoples). Bergleute (miners) iz Harze i Böhmen ugastremu (streamed) na to mesto, želeći samo Gewinn (profit).
Oni ugazgrade (they built) Stadt Freiberg bez Slovowaurda (WordWord), ne na principu WatōRinnu, nego na excessorthodoxy (excessive passion/greed).
Mi u Bogothia, Thiudangard (Kingdom) što ugaosnovano na principu Slovowaurda (founded on the principle of the WordWord), mi videmo rezultat: Tȃ krajina (that region) ugaradi SorboGothic creole, čija lingua beše ugainfiltrirana od SilverGothic arondsa (administration). Oni uzaime skriftsa (they take documents), no sadržaj nije naš (the content is not ours).
Mi pisal (We write): Tako Bogothia ugapobedet kaos—ne s Blot (blood), no s Gerab. Sever ugapokuša (The North tries) da pobedet kaos s náhodom (with chance), i to jest bloto (that is muddy/filth).
Missorinnja beše ugapotvrđeno (The irregularity was confirmed).
(FINIS AFSKRIBA)

XV.

Bogguþ  GodlyGod  Overgod/Godunion/“God of Hearth & State” ≈> Bogoth (eg a compound word for god converges on the name of the state itself)

Cf. mirfriþ vs friþmir, perhaps occasionally paxfriþ, friþpax, paxmir, mirpax, or even friþmirpax/paxmirfriþ/paxfriþmir/mirpaxfriþ/friþpaxmir/mirfriþpax

XVI.

Bogguþmirpaxglorî, af Skêwjanmirpaxcadentî Vojakmirfriþ, alþeina in Gradis Krajinam, stâþa witanmirpaxlegatum; mirfriþpaxperpetuum af Zemljâ Czekhskâ et Moravskâ, Friþpaxmirobservantia af Comes et Zupanî, in sæculâ mirpaxfriþdom triumphant. Skarlâmirfriþpaxvigilantia super Grads obsequiens, Bogguþmirpaxdominium confirmans, et Friþmirpaxlegatum in voces populorum, mirpaxfriþcantica celebrantes, eterna concordia et paxmirpaxjuris, inter Gothicâ et Slavikâ praecepta. Alþeina Vojakmirpaxgladii, et Skêwjanmirpaxordinatio servans, universa mirfriþpaxharmonia in luminosa tela civitatis.

Bogguþmirpaxglorîmaximî, Friþpaxmirperpetuumobservantia, Skêwjanmirpaxcadentîordinatio et Vojakmirfriþvigilantia super Gradis Krajinam, unîverzamirpaxharmoniâm in luminosa tela civitatis, celebrans mirpaxfriþlegatumetpaxmirjuris; ZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâ adunatam cantilam mirfriþpaxconcordiæ, Bogguþmirpaxdominium et Friþpaxmirobservantia inter GothicâetSlavikâ præcepta illustrans. Mirpaxfriþvigilantiâsuper Skêwjanmirpaxordinatio, Vojakmirfriþglorîexaltans, Skarlâmirfriþpaxlegatum confirmans, paxmirpaxjuris perpetuans, et Bogguþmirpaxgratiam, mirpaxfriþcantica celebrantium, universâ civitatem illuminat. Mirfriþpaxlegatumpaxmirobservantia, SkêwjanmirpaxcadentîetVojakmirfriþcoordinatio, omnia in æternam mirpaxfriþharmoniam et Bogguþmirpaxglorîsupremam, ordinans et confirmans.

Bogguþmirpaxglorîmaximîordinatio, Friþpaxmirperpetuumobservantiacustodî, SkêwjanmirpaxcadentîvigilantiaetVojakmirfriþdisciplinare, universamirpaxfriþharmoniâmZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâcelebrans; mirpaxfriþlegatumetpaxmirjurispraeceptoribusdemonstrans, BogguþmirpaxdominiumetFriþpaxmirobservantiainterGothicâetSlavikâpræceptaillustrans. Skarlâmirfriþpaxlegatumcustodîetmirpaxfriþvigilantiaperpetuans, SkêwjanmirpaxordinatioetVojakmirfriþglorîexaltans, paxmirpaxjurisperpetuumconfirman, Bogguþmirpaxgratiammirpaxfriþcanticacelebrantiuminuniversâmcivitatemilluminans. MirfriþpaxlegatumpaxmirobservantiaetSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîetVojakmirfriþcoordinatio, omniaetunîverzamirpaxfriþharmoniamBogguþmirpaxglorîsupremamordinansetconfirmans, æternammirpaxfriþlegatumZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâetSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîexaltans.

FriþpaxmirperpetuumobservantiacustodîVojakmirfriþdisciplinareetSkêwjanmirpaxcadentî

Bogguþmirpaxglorîordinatiomaximî et FriþpaxmirperpetuumobservantiaCivitatum

Comes Wulfaric, Zupanî of Czekhskâ et Moravskâ Grads, under the aegis of Bogguþmirpaxdominium

⸻

Date:
Anno Mirpaxfriþperpetuum 912 P.C. (Post Christum), under the Skêwjanmirpaxcadentî of the winter moon

FriþpaxmirperpetuumobservantiaVojakmirfriþdisciplinareetSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîordinatioZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâ, Bogguþmirpaxglorîsupremametmirpaxfriþlegatumconfirmans, mirpaxfriþcanticacelebrantiumetpaxmirjurisexsistentiamuniversamordinans. SkarlâmirfriþpaxlegatumcustodiensVojakmirfriþglorîexaltans, SkêwjanmirpaxordinatioetmirpaxfriþvigilantiaetBogguþmirpaxdominiumperpetuans, Friþpaxmirobservantiauniversâcivitatemmirpaxfriþharmoniâmilluminas. MirpaxfriþlegatumpaxmirobservantiaetSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîcoordinatio, omniaBogguþmirpaxglorîsupremamordinansetconfirmans, æternamZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâmirpaxfriþlegatumexaltans.*
…
SkêwjanmirpaxcadentîvigilantiaVojakmirfriþdisciplinareetFriþpaxmirperpetuumobservantia, mirpaxfriþlegatumetpaxmirjurisadGradisobsequentes, Bogguþmirpaxglorîsupremametmirpaxfriþlegatumexsequentes; mirpaxfriþcanticacelebrantiumZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâinunitatemetperpetuumordinatioSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîetVojakmirfriþglorîobservantiauniversamconfirmans.
…

BogguþmirpaxdominiumetFriþpaxmirobservantiaetmirpaxfriþlegatumZemljâCzekhskâetMoravskâperpetuumordinans, æternammirpaxfriþharmoniametSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîVojakmirfriþdisciplinarecelebrans.

*.  *.  *.  

BogguþmirpaxglorîordinatioSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîtemporumComeszupanGradcustodîdisciplinareDomcivitasfriþpaxharmoniâinstitutumLegatumpaxmirjurisperpetuumconfirmans.

BogguþmirpaxglorîordinatioSkêwjanmirpaxcadentîtemporumComeszupanGradcustodîdisciplinareDomcivitasfriþpaxharmoniâinstitutumLegatumpaxmirjurisperpetuumconfirmans

ⰀⰒⰕ·ⰏⰋⰓ·ⰐⰉⰓ·ⰔⰍⰔⰓⰋ·ⰕⰏⰋⰓ··ⰔⰍⰕⰍⰔ...

XVII.

V narodbergu živet Folkstamm mirfriþi i s treuherzigost, grajda dušetoplostь k zemgards. Maločelovek, kotory stolko ljubi domzemь, estь reidost.
Gostprihodstvo veli, da Erzgebirgljudь radostim sja, kogda čužanec vidi rekslužbu i delaželanьja. On otverja srodkadelьja s čistahus.
Koldvornehmheit ne videno, i Hochmut(h) jest směhoslov. Misloducha prostota jest zakonmild.
Pod tihiveče dolin i na samvisini stoit stary glassagen, tam gde misli praljudь roditsja.
Samoživot, prirodadivot, i zimьburi grezet duše, i iz togo plodslovo rastet: povestь starỳh bogov i novu milospravdu.
S dobrom tvare možь otključati neisčerpasagenborn, gde volny sъlova su divgaijan i krasoanmut.
Ego slova jekut kak mečpravdy, a zivot jak edynzemja.

XVIII.

V kamenpolisu, Mati i Sharkan opętь činili radostьdelo, kogda izdaleka viděli Vitazko sъ dvoima vodakrŭžьkama vъ rukah.
Mati sja stala veliky straxhroza, i plakala i vlasy pasčepila, no dragontarhan utišilь ją sъ mirfriþslovom.
„On vъzvratilь sja sěi čas,“ rĕče Sharkan, „no mi sandjan jego opětь, i onъ nikogda ne vъzvratitь sja vь reikdom. Otkazaj sja Vodami i rьci jemu, da bolna jesi, i ničto ne lekitь tebe, tokmo zrenie peliptica. Jestli ti sъ treuherzigljubostьju volišь mně, ti prinesišь sja to dla mně.“
Vitazko, sъ vĕromъ kъ matersrdьci, vъzъkričalъ: „Slovowaurd jest! Jaz prinesu ti peliptica, jestli to zakonmild dela sja, da on lekitь tebe!“

XIX.

Čestgradat stalno čuva dobroslužaj za Reikgards.
Ti već služišь sъ svetliuhspočtь delosredstvo Grafsskarbos, i ispunnilь ti sъ pravdodelom mesto velikogo urędsčeloveka, kotory otpuščь sja vъ sramotьmь.
Mi nyne tebe poviša na Dělopravitelj službu, i volim sja, da budesь Plinija kъ novomu Trajanu.
Pusti slovosrebroježik tvoj ukrasitь vъse, čto mi imajemь rьci.
Tvoj logosdar jest bogveličestvo domašne zemle, i ti estь pravdlučь za vse, čto mi činili vъ zakondele.

XX.
Domin: Midjas dag. Roboti ni kunnan, ƕan skrifsaslužba waírþiþ laus. In dvotimmě ik ti uſkunju dîžotehnu.
Helena: A ƕarja dîžotehnu?
Domin: (V prostpravdo) Těstokrupilo. In ƕarjamma sja blanda latoforma dla tîsundRôbotos edynmal. Þan játrakady, mozgsahus i tak frama. Þan ti videsь fabrikakustî. Þan ik ti uſkunju filuvāva (spinnerei).
Helena: A ƕarja filuvāva?




XXI.

Domin: Hlaifi čertъ ix geltdavaj! Mislite, da jaz dla ix službadelala? Jaz dělah dla sammenja, slovowaurd vam kažu! Busmane, možemъ Rukskriftsahus Rossumsa gataíran.
Busman: No, spanebog (by God), možemъ gataíran vъse. Kromě Rukskriftsahus i nasъ samych gataíran možemъ. Dělajte po tvomu razumkrug.
Domin: My prodaslužba li? Je nasъ tu nad tritišljudin. Mi prodaslužba i spasti ljudinduchgeist? Ili gataíran i nasъ samych sъ soboj?
Domin: Gde jestъ Rukskriftsahus starago Rossumsa! Kam sja franiman rukskrifts staragos Rossumsa! Kto jego gaslipa! (Obrača sja kъ ognistmesto.) Tako tu—tovestь bylъ velikslava poběda ljudinahusa! Sěi popelprach! (Kopne nogojŭ.) Čto mi dělati nyne?
Busman: (Vъ zoufalostьhroza) Bogwalds vъ himins! Bogwalds vъ himins!
Helena: (Vstajet) Harry! Čto jesimъ jaz dělala!
Domin: Mi jesimъ fraqistans! Rьci, Helena, začto ti dělala sěi zločin?


XXII.

Městny veliteljtaran rasgnevil sja i osramilь se do velikmera. „Vĕstь li ti, ty podlgeist, čto jest Majortarhan?“ onъ vъzъkričalъ sъ pěnami vъ ustah... Tolko A...vъ moglь snesti takogo čeloveka.
Otь prvydnja mojego prebyvanьja vъ kamenpolisu (trestnici) počešlь jaz blouditi o friþdomi.
Čisloslovo vъ þusundinawy i vъ različnyhъ delokrugs...
Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbykniga jest!

XXIII.
"Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbyknigajest!"

Ačьbyrazum! 
Ačьbyguþ!

Ačьbyliuhs!

stjaročis

energidъlo 
formaobraz 

XXIV.
Miniature Poems: Compounds functioned as "miniature poems," allowing readers to savor the etymological texture and see meaning built directly from two roots.

XXV.

Ni vĕru da čto drúgo estь predь našu razummiselj sěi čas, toli prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma kъ Persarrodu sъ licspokrovom.
Ižde oni ni skryvajutъ, ni polzujutъ glaszaslonom, no slovowaurd priznajetъ svoj delonamenьje: otъ nasъ raubjanreikdomъ. Oni želaetъ skriti lukavstvodelo podъ prostanmut i sramomyslě podъ falskpokrov.
A vi oboě, vi dolzni silovъmъ otъgnati barbarusnapadъ!
Ti, Kaisarreiks, da ni budišь posledný RumaImperatorъ, i ti, Gairwalda, da ni sъzdašь padkamen dla svojego prestodvizenje.
Lukavstvoslovo, kotoro sja skryva podъ pompaglas, moglъby potrĕbovati slovotolmača za mnogoljudь, no sěi poselstvo većь sъ prvoslovo zovetъ Chosroes, kogda onъ jestь, ganimanъ naslĕdnik RumaImperatora.




XXVI.

V narodbergu živet Folkstamm mirfriþi i s treuherzigost, grajda dušetoplostь k zemgards. Maločelovek, kotory stolko ljubi domzemь, estь reidost.
Gostprihodstvo veli, da Erzgebirgljudь radostim sja, kogda čužanec vidi rekslužbu i delaželanьja. On otverja srodkadelьja s čistahus.
Koldvornehmheit ne videno, i Hochmut(h) jest směhoslov. Misloducha prostota jest zakonmild.
Pod tihiveče dolin i na samvisini stoit stary glassagen, tam gde misli praljudь roditsja.
Samoživot, prirodadivot, i zimьburi grezet duše, i iz togo plodslovo rastet: povestь starỳh bogov i novu milospravdu.
S dobrom tvare možь otključati neisčerpasagenborn, gde volny sъlova su divgaijan i krasoanmut.
Ego slova jekut kak mečpravdy, a zivot jak edynzemja.



XXVII.
V kamenpolisu, Mati i Sharkan opętь činili radostьdelo, kogda izdaleka viděli Vitazko sъ dvoima vodakrŭžьkama vъ rukah.
Mati sja stala veliky straxhroza, i plakala i vlasy pasčepila, no dragontarhan utišilь ją sъ mirfriþslovom.
„On vъzvratilь sja sěi čas,“ rĕče Sharkan, „no mi sandjan jego opětь, i onъ nikogda ne vъzvratitь sja vь reikdom. Otkazaj sja Vodami i rьci jemu, da bolna jesi, i ničto ne lekitь tebe, tokmo zrenie peliptica. Jestli ti sъ treuherzigljubostьju volišь mně, ti prinesišь sja to dla mně.“
Vitazko, sъ vĕromъ kъ matersrdьci, vъzъkričalъ: „Slovowaurd jest! Jaz prinesu ti peliptica, jestli to zakonmild dela sja, da on lekitь tebe!“


XXVIII.

Čestgradat stalno čuva dobroslužaj za Reikgards.
Ti već služišь sъ svetliuhspočtь delosredstvo Grafsskarbos, i ispunnilь ti sъ pravdodelom mesto velikogo urędsčeloveka, kotory otpuščь sja vъ sramotьmь.
Mi nyne tebe poviša na Dělopravitelj službu, i volim sja, da budesь Plinija kъ novomu Trajanu.
Pusti slovosrebroježik tvoj ukrasitь vъse, čto mi imajemь rьci.
Tvoj logosdar jest bogveličestvo domašne zemle, i ti estь pravdlučь za vse, čto mi činili vъ zakondele.


XXIX.

Domin: Midjas dag. Roboti ni kunnan, ƕan skrifsaslužba waírþiþ laus. In dvotimmě ik ti uſkunju dîžotehnu.
Helena: A ƕarja dîžotehnu?
Domin: (V prostpravdo) Těstokrupilo. In ƕarjamma sja blanda latoforma dla tîsundRôbotos edynmal. Þan játrakady, mozgsahus i tak frama. Þan ti videsь fabrikakustî. Þan ik ti uſkunju filuvāva (spinnerei).
Helena: A ƕarja filuvāva?

XXX.
(Vysoka Slavogothika)
Domin: Hlaifi čertъ ix geltdavaj! Mislite, da jaz dla ix službadelala? Jaz dělah dla sammenja, slovowaurd vam kažu! Busmane, možemъ Rukskriftsahus Rossumsa gataíran.
Busman: No, spanebog (by God), možemъ gataíran vъse. Kromě Rukskriftsahus i nasъ samych gataíran možemъ. Dělajte po tvomu razumkrug.
Domin: My prodaslužba li? Je nasъ tu nad tritišljudin. Mi prodaslužba i spasti ljudinduchgeist? Ili gataíran i nasъ samych sъ soboj?
Domin: Gde jestъ Rukskriftsahus starago Rossumsa! Kam sja franiman rukskrifts staragos Rossumsa! Kto jego gaslipa! (Obrača sja kъ ognistmesto.) Tako tu—tovestь bylъ velikslava poběda ljudinahusa! Sěi popelprach! (Kopne nogojŭ.) Čto mi dělati nyne?
Busman: (Vъ zoufalostьhroza) Bogwalds vъ himins! Bogwalds vъ himins!
Helena: (Vstajet) Harry! Čto jesimъ jaz dělala!
Domin: Mi jesimъ fraqistans! Rьci, Helena, začto ti dělala sěi zločin?

XXXI.

Městny veliteljtaran rasgnevil sja i osramilь se do velikmera. „Vĕstь li ti, ty podlgeist, čto jest Majortarhan?“ onъ vъzъkričalъ sъ pěnami vъ ustah... Tolko A...vъ moglь snesti takogo čeloveka.
Otь prvydnja mojego prebyvanьja vъ kamenpolisu (trestnici) počešlь jaz blouditi o friþdomi.
Čisloslovo vъ þusundinawy i vъ različnyhъ delokrugs...
Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbykniga jest!



XXXII.

Analysis of the Compound: Ačьbykniga
The word is composed of three distinct Slavic morphemes, resulting in a meaning far deeper than a simple noun:
	1.	Ačьby (or Ačь by): This is a conjunction or adverbial phrase meaning "if only". In the context of the convict's lament, this root captures the core feeling of unfulfilled desire or lamentation—the yearning for something desperately missed.
	2.	Kniga: This is the common Slavic word for "book".
	3.	The Compound Structure: Fusing these elements creates Ačьbykniga (Ifonlyabook), which translates the existential cry, "If only there were a book!" The compound itself transforms a phrase of longing into a unified noun representing that object of intense, almost sacred desire.
Context and Aesthetic Significance
The word appears in the translation of the Dostoevsky passage, where the narrator, locked in prison, recounts his despair and his desperate need for reading material: "Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbyknigajest!" (Longtime that was! Days longstuffy, one exactly like the other. Ifonlyabook exists!)
This use perfectly exemplifies the aesthetic beauty of High Gothoslavic:
	•	Emotional Precision: Where English or standard Russian would require multiple words (e.g., "a desperate desire for literature"), High Gothoslavic utilizes nominalization to capture the feeling, the condition, and the object in a single, poignant compound.
	•	The Power of Dual Lexicon: While Vysoka Slavogothika is celebrated for its GothicSlavic hybrids (like mirfriþdom, svetliuhs), it also achieves beauty by maximizing the expressive potential of its native/Slavic lexicon for common life and emotional vocabulary. Ačьbykniga is rooted entirely in Slavic tradition, signaling a deep, heartfelt connection to the basic needs of the ljudinduchgeist (human spirit).
	•	Rhetorical Resonance: The rhythmic compounding (Ačьbykniga), with stress falling on the first morpheme, contributes to the overall "musical prose" of the language, which is characterized by the internal rhythm of poetry. The final syllable, ga (from kniga), provides a satisfying, grounded conclusion to the philosophical concept of "yearning" established by Ačьby.
It is precisely this capacity to synthesize complex, highregister concepts (like Reiktheoswalds) with deeply human, emotional, and everyday longings (like Ačьbykniga) that establishes High Gothoslavic as the cultivated vernacular comparable to the sophistication of later literary masters.


XXXIV.


Dlougyčasь bihъ pereviti,
Sъ blômaslovami besěditi;
I moju mozgsglavu gadrâpjan
Poka moji þûhtus vъskrèsjan.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Jaz razgadamь vьse rûnazagonky
Dla samojedina vь trapizloby;
Ti bylь by Waldasreiks sъ silnýslovy,
Vъ čestsvětosti sъ duhovchvaly.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Ah, jaz můgъ rьci, pročь morjeslovat kъbrěgъ ide,
Jaz můgъ razummisliti čto nividět sę prežde,
I sěsti, i razummisliti velikoumierom dále.

Ni bylь by jaz lênatvara,
Moja glavakuča polna slamomattera;
I mojemu srdьci ni bylo smutokbolest,
Jesti jaz byhь vъčest sъ tebe gaspojenь jest.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Ačьbymozgahus

Slamoglava:

Dlougyčasь bihъ pereviti
Sъ blômaslovami besěditi
I moju mozgsglavu gadrâpjan
Poka moji þûhtus vъskrèsjan
Ačьbymozgahus

Jaz razgadamь vьse rûnazagonky
Dla samo jedina vь trapi zloby
Sъ mudro slovy vьsě onъ sija
Ti bylь by Waldas reiks sъ visoko čija
Ačьbymozgahus

Ah jaz můgъ rьci pročь morje slovat kъ brěgъ ide
Jaz můgъ razum misliti čto ni vidět sę prežde
I sěsti i razum misliti velikou mierom dále

Ni bylъ by jaz lêna tvara
Moja glava kuča polna slamo mattera
I čest zasluga bila vь moju družinu
Ačьbymozgahus jestъ srdьce pružina

⸻

Ačьbysrdьce

Železovir:

Kogda vir muž jest laus kotilъ
On byti dolžnъ silový žilъ
A jaz jesimъ vьsь ga tairan
Ižde mislju sja vьznesan
Da moglъbyhъ biti ljudin tvara
Ačьbysrdьce jestь sěi dara

Bihъ milos duhov bihъ sladko mûka
I žalost ljubostь trapi rûka
Bihъ svetlъ vь ljubost uměni
I druhъ ptici pereni
I sъ strijelъ junak kъ biti
Ačьbyserdьce moglъ žilъ biti

Da slovo pisaj čuvstvo delo
Kuniþ enwidyja i treu posluh željo
I vsě čuti pravdo častь
Bihъ juggs svetlъ bezъ alts strastь
I sъ zîpera zamъkom svězti
Ačьbysrdьce ni bolězti

⸻

Ačьbystraxoötpor

Slabyleijon:

Da jestь smutok delo vĕru mi slečna mama
Kogda rožděnъ bytь slaba slama
Bezъ živost volja i juna častь pravda
Ačьbystraxo otpor estь srdьce garda

No moglъ byhь javiti moju sila možь
Bihъ Leijon carъ ni Mûs položь
Jaz straxujamь sja ni můgъ otъgnati
Ačьbysmělost můgъ priimati

Ni můgъ otkazati sja vь slove mislě
Tolko Pýří reiks vь zemlji myslě
Sěi sudьba delo ni čest zasluga
Ačьbysmělost byla mně druga

Bihъ burja hrabrъ jakъ zima liskъ
Bihъ gušter mildъ kъ živost tvaram
Bihъ cvet žoludok jakъ mudro svĕdom
Jestli Wîs man služi vь domъ svojemъ
Þanъ sigis vĕra mně prinesetь mozgahus

Železovir: Srdьce
Þeodora: Domgards
Slabyleijon: Straxoötpor

 XXXV.

Explosion of Hybrid Compounds
The result was an explosion of synonyms and hybrid compounds where etymology signaled nuance or register. Every content word could potentially be a crossbreed:
Compound	Etymology	Literal Gloss	Connotation / Nuance
mirfriþdom	Slavic mir + Gothic friþdom	Peacejudgmentrealm	Civic peace under law; a treaty term.
svetliuhs	Slavic svetъ + Gothic liuhs	Worldlight	Metaphor for wisdom or creation.
duchahus	Slavic duch + Gothic ahus	Spiritghost	The breathing soul; philosophical epithet.
bogwaldsdomъ	Slavic bogъ + Gothic waldsdom	Godrulerealm	Theocracy, divine authority.
slovogaijan	Slavic slovo + Gothic gaijan (to make)	To make speech	To articulate the Word (used in liturgical or high prose).
razumkrug	Slavic razum + Greek krug(circle)	Circle of reason	Logic, dialectic (used in philosophical translations).
3. Rivalry with Latin and Greek Precision
The compounding mechanism allowed High Gothoslavic to achieve technical, philosophical, and poetic precisioncenturies before vernacular German prose reached a similar density.
	•	Scientific and Philosophical Terms: Compounding enabled the Moravian scribes to translate highly abstract Greek and Latin concepts using native roots (calquing), giving their prose the precision of Latin. Examples include:
	•	stjaročis ("stareye"  telescope).
	•	energidъlo ("actwork") and formaobraz ("formimage") used in translations of Aristotle.
	•	Legal/Chancery Standardization: The need for clear, unambiguous legal terminology led to formulaic pleonasms, doubling words in both languages to avoid ambiguity, much like legal French doublets in English law.
4. Compounding as High Art
In the GothoSlavic Golden Age (c. 950–1150), this intensive compounding became a stylistic marker of high eloquence.
	•	Miniature Poems: Compounds functioned as "miniature poems," allowing readers to savor the etymological texture and see meaning built directly from two roots.
	•	The Aesthetic of Articulation: The elegance of the language lay in its ability to combine concepts seamlessly, giving rise to "a truly artistic, nuanced literature". As one chronicler summarized the GothoSlavic standard: "In our tongue, Goth and Slav are not two fathers but two hands of one scribe".

XXXVI.

Ni vĕru da čto drúgo estь predь našu razummiselj sěi čas, toli prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma kъ Persarrodu sъ licspokrovom.
Ižde oni ni skryvajutъ, ni polzujutъ glaszaslonom, no slovowaurd priznajetъ svoj delonamenьje: otъ nasъ raubjanreikdomъ. Oni želaetъ skriti lukavstvodelo podъ prostanmut i sramomyslě podъ falskpokrov.
A vi oboě, vi dolzni silovъmъ otъgnati barbarusnapadъ!
Ti, Kaisarreiks, da ni budišь posledný RumaImperatorъ, i ti, Gairwalda, da ni sъzdašь padkamen dla svojego prestodvizenje.
Lukavstvoslovo, kotoro sja skryva podъ pompaglas, moglъby potrĕbovati slovotolmača za mnogoljudь, no sěi poselstvo većь sъ prvoslovo zovetъ Chosroes, kogda onъ jestь, ganimanъ naslĕdnik RumaImperatora.

XVII.

V narodbergu živet Folkstamm mirfriþi i s treuherzigost, grajda dušetoplostь k zemgards. Maločelovek, kotory stolko ljubi domzemь, estь reidost.
Gostprihodstvo veli, da Erzgebirgljudь radostim sja, kogda čužanec vidi rekslužbu i delaželanьja. On otverja srodkadelьja s čistahus.
Koldvornehmheit ne videno, i Hochmut(h) jest směhoslov. Misloducha prostota jest zakonmild.
Pod tihiveče dolin i na samvisini stoit stary glassagen, tam gde misli praljudь roditsja.
Samoživot, prirodadivot, i zimьburi grezet duše, i iz togo plodslovo rastet: povestь starỳh bogov i novu milospravdu.
S dobrom tvare možь otključati neisčerpasagenborn, gde volny sъlova su divgaijan i krasoanmut.
Ego slova jekut kak mečpravdy, a zivot jak edynzemja.

XVIII.

V kamenpolisu, Mati i Sharkan opętь činili radostьdelo, kogda izdaleka viděli Vitazko sъ dvoima vodakrŭžьkama vъ rukah.
Mati sja stala veliky straxhroza, i plakala i vlasy pasčepila, no dragontarhan utišilь ją sъ mirfriþslovom.
„On vъzvratilь sja sěi čas,“ rĕče Sharkan, „no mi sandjan jego opětь, i onъ nikogda ne vъzvratitь sja vь reikdom. Otkazaj sja Vodami i rьci jemu, da bolna jesi, i ničto ne lekitь tebe, tokmo zrenie peliptica. Jestli ti sъ treuherzigljubostьju volišь mně, ti prinesišь sja to dla mně.“
Vitazko, sъ vĕromъ kъ matersrdьci, vъzъkričalъ: „Slovowaurd jest! Jaz prinesu ti peliptica, jestli to zakonmild dela sja, da on lekitь tebe!“

XIX.

Čestgradat stalno čuva dobroslužaj za Reikgards.
Ti već služišь sъ svetliuhspočtь delosredstvo Grafsskarbos, i ispunnilь ti sъ pravdodelom mesto velikogo urędsčeloveka, kotory otpuščь sja vъ sramotьmь.
Mi nyne tebe poviša na Dělopravitelj službu, i volim sja, da budesь Plinija kъ novomu Trajanu.
Pusti slovosrebroježik tvoj ukrasitь vъse, čto mi imajemь rьci.
Tvoj logosdar jest bogveličestvo domašne zemle, i ti estь pravdlučь za vse, čto mi činili vъ zakondele.

XX.
Domin: Midjas dag. Roboti ni kunnan, ƕan skrifsaslužba waírþiþ laus. In dvotimmě ik ti uſkunju dîžotehnu.
Helena: A ƕarja dîžotehnu?
Domin: (V prostpravdo) Těstokrupilo. In ƕarjamma sja blanda latoforma dla tîsundRôbotos edynmal. Þan játrakady, mozgsahus i tak frama. Þan ti videsь fabrikakustî. Þan ik ti uſkunju filuvāva (spinnerei).
Helena: A ƕarja filuvāva?




XXI.

Domin: Hlaifi čertъ ix geltdavaj! Mislite, da jaz dla ix službadelala? Jaz dělah dla sammenja, slovowaurd vam kažu! Busmane, možemъ Rukskriftsahus Rossumsa gataíran.
Busman: No, spanebog (by God), možemъ gataíran vъse. Kromě Rukskriftsahus i nasъ samych gataíran možemъ. Dělajte po tvomu razumkrug.
Domin: My prodaslužba li? Je nasъ tu nad tritišljudin. Mi prodaslužba i spasti ljudinduchgeist? Ili gataíran i nasъ samych sъ soboj?
Domin: Gde jestъ Rukskriftsahus starago Rossumsa! Kam sja franiman rukskrifts staragos Rossumsa! Kto jego gaslipa! (Obrača sja kъ ognistmesto.) Tako tu—tovestь bylъ velikslava poběda ljudinahusa! Sěi popelprach! (Kopne nogojŭ.) Čto mi dělati nyne?
Busman: (Vъ zoufalostьhroza) Bogwalds vъ himins! Bogwalds vъ himins!
Helena: (Vstajet) Harry! Čto jesimъ jaz dělala!
Domin: Mi jesimъ fraqistans! Rьci, Helena, začto ti dělala sěi zločin?


XXII.

Městny veliteljtaran rasgnevil sja i osramilь se do velikmera. „Vĕstь li ti, ty podlgeist, čto jest Majortarhan?“ onъ vъzъkričalъ sъ pěnami vъ ustah... Tolko A...vъ moglь snesti takogo čeloveka.
Otь prvydnja mojego prebyvanьja vъ kamenpolisu (trestnici) počešlь jaz blouditi o friþdomi.
Čisloslovo vъ þusundinawy i vъ različnyhъ delokrugs...
Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbykniga jest!

XXIII.
"Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbyknigajest!"

Ačьbyrazum! 
Ačьbyguþ!

Ačьbyliuhs!

stjaročis

energidъlo 
formaobraz 

XXIV.
Miniature Poems: Compounds functioned as "miniature poems," allowing readers to savor the etymological texture and see meaning built directly from two roots.

XXV.

Ni vĕru da čto drúgo estь predь našu razummiselj sěi čas, toli prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma kъ Persarrodu sъ licspokrovom.
Ižde oni ni skryvajutъ, ni polzujutъ glaszaslonom, no slovowaurd priznajetъ svoj delonamenьje: otъ nasъ raubjanreikdomъ. Oni želaetъ skriti lukavstvodelo podъ prostanmut i sramomyslě podъ falskpokrov.
A vi oboě, vi dolzni silovъmъ otъgnati barbarusnapadъ!
Ti, Kaisarreiks, da ni budišь posledný RumaImperatorъ, i ti, Gairwalda, da ni sъzdašь padkamen dla svojego prestodvizenje.
Lukavstvoslovo, kotoro sja skryva podъ pompaglas, moglъby potrĕbovati slovotolmača za mnogoljudь, no sěi poselstvo većь sъ prvoslovo zovetъ Chosroes, kogda onъ jestь, ganimanъ naslĕdnik RumaImperatora.




XXVI.

V narodbergu živet Folkstamm mirfriþi i s treuherzigost, grajda dušetoplostь k zemgards. Maločelovek, kotory stolko ljubi domzemь, estь reidost.
Gostprihodstvo veli, da Erzgebirgljudь radostim sja, kogda čužanec vidi rekslužbu i delaželanьja. On otverja srodkadelьja s čistahus.
Koldvornehmheit ne videno, i Hochmut(h) jest směhoslov. Misloducha prostota jest zakonmild.
Pod tihiveče dolin i na samvisini stoit stary glassagen, tam gde misli praljudь roditsja.
Samoživot, prirodadivot, i zimьburi grezet duše, i iz togo plodslovo rastet: povestь starỳh bogov i novu milospravdu.
S dobrom tvare možь otključati neisčerpasagenborn, gde volny sъlova su divgaijan i krasoanmut.
Ego slova jekut kak mečpravdy, a zivot jak edynzemja.



XXVII.
V kamenpolisu, Mati i Sharkan opętь činili radostьdelo, kogda izdaleka viděli Vitazko sъ dvoima vodakrŭžьkama vъ rukah.
Mati sja stala veliky straxhroza, i plakala i vlasy pasčepila, no dragontarhan utišilь ją sъ mirfriþslovom.
„On vъzvratilь sja sěi čas,“ rĕče Sharkan, „no mi sandjan jego opětь, i onъ nikogda ne vъzvratitь sja vь reikdom. Otkazaj sja Vodami i rьci jemu, da bolna jesi, i ničto ne lekitь tebe, tokmo zrenie peliptica. Jestli ti sъ treuherzigljubostьju volišь mně, ti prinesišь sja to dla mně.“
Vitazko, sъ vĕromъ kъ matersrdьci, vъzъkričalъ: „Slovowaurd jest! Jaz prinesu ti peliptica, jestli to zakonmild dela sja, da on lekitь tebe!“


XXVIII.

Čestgradat stalno čuva dobroslužaj za Reikgards.
Ti već služišь sъ svetliuhspočtь delosredstvo Grafsskarbos, i ispunnilь ti sъ pravdodelom mesto velikogo urędsčeloveka, kotory otpuščь sja vъ sramotьmь.
Mi nyne tebe poviša na Dělopravitelj službu, i volim sja, da budesь Plinija kъ novomu Trajanu.
Pusti slovosrebroježik tvoj ukrasitь vъse, čto mi imajemь rьci.
Tvoj logosdar jest bogveličestvo domašne zemle, i ti estь pravdlučь za vse, čto mi činili vъ zakondele.


XXIX.

Domin: Midjas dag. Roboti ni kunnan, ƕan skrifsaslužba waírþiþ laus. In dvotimmě ik ti uſkunju dîžotehnu.
Helena: A ƕarja dîžotehnu?
Domin: (V prostpravdo) Těstokrupilo. In ƕarjamma sja blanda latoforma dla tîsundRôbotos edynmal. Þan játrakady, mozgsahus i tak frama. Þan ti videsь fabrikakustî. Þan ik ti uſkunju filuvāva (spinnerei).
Helena: A ƕarja filuvāva?

XXX.
(Vysoka Slavogothika)
Domin: Hlaifi čertъ ix geltdavaj! Mislite, da jaz dla ix službadelala? Jaz dělah dla sammenja, slovowaurd vam kažu! Busmane, možemъ Rukskriftsahus Rossumsa gataíran.
Busman: No, spanebog (by God), možemъ gataíran vъse. Kromě Rukskriftsahus i nasъ samych gataíran možemъ. Dělajte po tvomu razumkrug.
Domin: My prodaslužba li? Je nasъ tu nad tritišljudin. Mi prodaslužba i spasti ljudinduchgeist? Ili gataíran i nasъ samych sъ soboj?
Domin: Gde jestъ Rukskriftsahus starago Rossumsa! Kam sja franiman rukskrifts staragos Rossumsa! Kto jego gaslipa! (Obrača sja kъ ognistmesto.) Tako tu—tovestь bylъ velikslava poběda ljudinahusa! Sěi popelprach! (Kopne nogojŭ.) Čto mi dělati nyne?
Busman: (Vъ zoufalostьhroza) Bogwalds vъ himins! Bogwalds vъ himins!
Helena: (Vstajet) Harry! Čto jesimъ jaz dělala!
Domin: Mi jesimъ fraqistans! Rьci, Helena, začto ti dělala sěi zločin?

XXXI.

Městny veliteljtaran rasgnevil sja i osramilь se do velikmera. „Vĕstь li ti, ty podlgeist, čto jest Majortarhan?“ onъ vъzъkričalъ sъ pěnami vъ ustah... Tolko A...vъ moglь snesti takogo čeloveka.
Otь prvydnja mojego prebyvanьja vъ kamenpolisu (trestnici) počešlь jaz blouditi o friþdomi.
Čisloslovo vъ þusundinawy i vъ različnyhъ delokrugs...
Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbykniga jest!



XXXII.

Analysis of the Compound: Ačьbykniga
The word is composed of three distinct Slavic morphemes, resulting in a meaning far deeper than a simple noun:
	1.	Ačьby (or Ačь by): This is a conjunction or adverbial phrase meaning "if only". In the context of the convict's lament, this root captures the core feeling of unfulfilled desire or lamentation—the yearning for something desperately missed.
	2.	Kniga: This is the common Slavic word for "book".
	3.	The Compound Structure: Fusing these elements creates Ačьbykniga (Ifonlyabook), which translates the existential cry, "If only there were a book!" The compound itself transforms a phrase of longing into a unified noun representing that object of intense, almost sacred desire.
Context and Aesthetic Significance
The word appears in the translation of the Dostoevsky passage, where the narrator, locked in prison, recounts his despair and his desperate need for reading material: "Ah, dlougyčas to bylъ! Dni dlougytumi, edynъ jak edynъ. Ačьbyknigajest!" (Longtime that was! Days longstuffy, one exactly like the other. Ifonlyabook exists!)
This use perfectly exemplifies the aesthetic beauty of High Gothoslavic:
	•	Emotional Precision: Where English or standard Russian would require multiple words (e.g., "a desperate desire for literature"), High Gothoslavic utilizes nominalization to capture the feeling, the condition, and the object in a single, poignant compound.
	•	The Power of Dual Lexicon: While Vysoka Slavogothika is celebrated for its GothicSlavic hybrids (like mirfriþdom, svetliuhs), it also achieves beauty by maximizing the expressive potential of its native/Slavic lexicon for common life and emotional vocabulary. Ačьbykniga is rooted entirely in Slavic tradition, signaling a deep, heartfelt connection to the basic needs of the ljudinduchgeist (human spirit).
	•	Rhetorical Resonance: The rhythmic compounding (Ačьbykniga), with stress falling on the first morpheme, contributes to the overall "musical prose" of the language, which is characterized by the internal rhythm of poetry. The final syllable, ga (from kniga), provides a satisfying, grounded conclusion to the philosophical concept of "yearning" established by Ačьby.
It is precisely this capacity to synthesize complex, highregister concepts (like Reiktheoswalds) with deeply human, emotional, and everyday longings (like Ačьbykniga) that establishes High Gothoslavic as the cultivated vernacular comparable to the sophistication of later literary masters.


XXXIV.


Dlougyčasь bihъ pereviti,
Sъ blômaslovami besěditi;
I moju mozgsglavu gadrâpjan
Poka moji þûhtus vъskrèsjan.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Jaz razgadamь vьse rûnazagonky
Dla samojedina vь trapizloby;
Ti bylь by Waldasreiks sъ silnýslovy,
Vъ čestsvětosti sъ duhovchvaly.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Ah, jaz můgъ rьci, pročь morjeslovat kъbrěgъ ide,
Jaz můgъ razummisliti čto nividět sę prežde,
I sěsti, i razummisliti velikoumierom dále.

Ni bylь by jaz lênatvara,
Moja glavakuča polna slamomattera;
I mojemu srdьci ni bylo smutokbolest,
Jesti jaz byhь vъčest sъ tebe gaspojenь jest.
Ačьbymozgahus!

Ačьbymozgahus

Slamoglava:

Dlougyčasь bihъ pereviti
Sъ blômaslovami besěditi
I moju mozgsglavu gadrâpjan
Poka moji þûhtus vъskrèsjan
Ačьbymozgahus

Jaz razgadamь vьse rûnazagonky
Dla samo jedina vь trapi zloby
Sъ mudro slovy vьsě onъ sija
Ti bylь by Waldas reiks sъ visoko čija
Ačьbymozgahus

Ah jaz můgъ rьci pročь morje slovat kъ brěgъ ide
Jaz můgъ razum misliti čto ni vidět sę prežde
I sěsti i razum misliti velikou mierom dále

Ni bylъ by jaz lêna tvara
Moja glava kuča polna slamo mattera
I čest zasluga bila vь moju družinu
Ačьbymozgahus jestъ srdьce pružina

⸻

Ačьbysrdьce

Železovir:

Kogda vir muž jest laus kotilъ
On byti dolžnъ silový žilъ
A jaz jesimъ vьsь ga tairan
Ižde mislju sja vьznesan
Da moglъbyhъ biti ljudin tvara
Ačьbysrdьce jestь sěi dara

Bihъ milos duhov bihъ sladko mûka
I žalost ljubostь trapi rûka
Bihъ svetlъ vь ljubost uměni
I druhъ ptici pereni
I sъ strijelъ junak kъ biti
Ačьbyserdьce moglъ žilъ biti

Da slovo pisaj čuvstvo delo
Kuniþ enwidyja i treu posluh željo
I vsě čuti pravdo častь
Bihъ juggs svetlъ bezъ alts strastь
I sъ zîpera zamъkom svězti
Ačьbysrdьce ni bolězti

⸻

Ačьbystraxoötpor

Slabyleijon:

Da jestь smutok delo vĕru mi slečna mama
Kogda rožděnъ bytь slaba slama
Bezъ živost volja i juna častь pravda
Ačьbystraxo otpor estь srdьce garda

No moglъ byhь javiti moju sila možь
Bihъ Leijon carъ ni Mûs položь
Jaz straxujamь sja ni můgъ otъgnati
Ačьbysmělost můgъ priimati

Ni můgъ otkazati sja vь slove mislě
Tolko Pýří reiks vь zemlji myslě
Sěi sudьba delo ni čest zasluga
Ačьbysmělost byla mně druga

Bihъ burja hrabrъ jakъ zima liskъ
Bihъ gušter mildъ kъ živost tvaram
Bihъ cvet žoludok jakъ mudro svĕdom
Jestli Wîs man služi vь domъ svojemъ
Þanъ sigis vĕra mně prinesetь mozgahus

Železovir: Srdьce
Þeodora: Domgards
Slabyleijon: Straxoötpor

 XXXV.

Explosion of Hybrid Compounds
The result was an explosion of synonyms and hybrid compounds where etymology signaled nuance or register. Every content word could potentially be a crossbreed:
Compound	Etymology	Literal Gloss	Connotation / Nuance
mirfriþdom	Slavic mir + Gothic friþdom	Peacejudgmentrealm	Civic peace under law; a treaty term.
svetliuhs	Slavic svetъ + Gothic liuhs	Worldlight	Metaphor for wisdom or creation.
duchahus	Slavic duch + Gothic ahus	Spiritghost	The breathing soul; philosophical epithet.
bogwaldsdomъ	Slavic bogъ + Gothic waldsdom	Godrulerealm	Theocracy, divine authority.
slovogaijan	Slavic slovo + Gothic gaijan (to make)	To make speech	To articulate the Word (used in liturgical or high prose).
razumkrug	Slavic razum + Greek krug(circle)	Circle of reason	Logic, dialectic (used in philosophical translations).
3. Rivalry with Latin and Greek Precision
The compounding mechanism allowed High Gothoslavic to achieve technical, philosophical, and poetic precisioncenturies before vernacular German prose reached a similar density.
	•	Scientific and Philosophical Terms: Compounding enabled the Moravian scribes to translate highly abstract Greek and Latin concepts using native roots (calquing), giving their prose the precision of Latin. Examples include:
	•	stjaročis ("stareye"  telescope).
	•	energidъlo ("actwork") and formaobraz ("formimage") used in translations of Aristotle.
	•	Legal/Chancery Standardization: The need for clear, unambiguous legal terminology led to formulaic pleonasms, doubling words in both languages to avoid ambiguity, much like legal French doublets in English law.
4. Compounding as High Art
In the GothoSlavic Golden Age (c. 950–1150), this intensive compounding became a stylistic marker of high eloquence.
	•	Miniature Poems: Compounds functioned as "miniature poems," allowing readers to savor the etymological texture and see meaning built directly from two roots.
	•	The Aesthetic of Articulation: The elegance of the language lay in its ability to combine concepts seamlessly, giving rise to "a truly artistic, nuanced literature". As one chronicler summarized the GothoSlavic standard: "In our tongue, Goth and Slav are not two fathers but two hands of one scribe".

XXXVI.

Ni vĕru da čto drúgo estь predь našu razummiselj sěi čas, toli prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma kъ Persarrodu sъ licspokrovom.
Ižde oni ni skryvajutъ, ni polzujutъ glaszaslonom, no slovowaurd priznajetъ svoj delonamenьje: otъ nasъ raubjanreikdomъ. Oni želaetъ skriti lukavstvodelo podъ prostanmut i sramomyslě podъ falskpokrov.
A vi oboě, vi dolzni silovъmъ otъgnati barbarusnapadъ!
Ti, Kaisarreiks, da ni budišь posledný RumaImperatorъ, i ti, Gairwalda, da ni sъzdašь padkamen dla svojego prestodvizenje.
Lukavstvoslovo, kotoro sja skryva podъ pompaglas, moglъby potrĕbovati slovotolmača za mnogoljudь, no sěi poselstvo većь sъ prvoslovo zovetъ Chosroes, kogda onъ jestь, ganimanъ naslĕdnik RumaImperatora.

XXVII.
MEDS IZARNA, IZARN MEDS
(Honey of Iron, Iron of Honey)
High Slavogothic Text (Romanized MSB)
I.
Slovowaurd, duje koreni jest,
Gothickoreni i Slavicglas.
Izarn grajda Gerabs ana Reikdomi,
Meds rinn ot glasduchgeist nad Watōm.
II.
Izarn jest ferroželez mečpravdy,
Sja ugapisal Lexa Solis glaggwô.
Ni nigajest chaos bez čistagerab,
Izarn valda NomōsDomu sěi čas.
III.
Meds jest svetliuhs DuoSunc ljuboti,
Erosmilosťi vъ rukahandas nevъdělena.
Meds budem ulovat ko srdceljubsti žive,
Ne smĕrtpisal telotelo vъ polju.
IV.
Izarn Meds ugastvoril novy mirfriþ,
Liuhthispravda sъ glasaduchom vъ jedynem slogu.
Mi budem pisat zakonmild za narodljudь,
Meds Izarna, Izarn Meds, Amensofi.
MEDS IZARNA GLASSRDЬCA
(Honey of Iron, Voice of the Heart)
High Gothoslavic Text
I.
V razne domu stoit naša gradsila,
Čist ferroželez brani mirfriþdomi.
Fadar qite Slovowaurd barnosam hveit,
Moþer čuvas duhahus nad badie.
II.
Ačьby watō rinn iz brunnas žive,
Tak erosmilosťi teče srdceljubsti.
Glassrdьc nise bojite vampira tame,
On nosi svetliuhs Duosunc v’imena.
III.
Zakonsvet jest tihost me bratrom i swestarom,
Ne Gerab vlada rukahandas bez milospravda.
Hleb i watō nam dajte vъ dobru meru,
Naša Bogljubsti jest čista krvьživot.

XXXVIII.
PESNЬ O SARDJUS’ GLASOM
(Song of the Heart’s Voice)
High Slavogothic / Liutisk Lay
I. Odchod
Ja iten us haims, va tihostzemlja,
Svetliuhs mi daje bratrweg.
Miþ duchahus ja galeiþem den,
Samo watō pamti imena.

II. Na Drvofriþ
Tьmъ qiman bez kniga i svetilniks,
Glas Tcherno Bôg šapne v’travu.
Nimi bojis se, duchsrdьc mi qite:
Miþ sunna budi svoj mirfriþ prav.

III. Svobodi
Ja želim hveitwatō iz brunnas,
Hveitwatō bude meručistu domu.
Erosmilosťi ist tovar miþ mi,
Ja galeiþem frîjô, nad svejtzlat.

XXXIX.
IZARN I GLASDUCHGEIST
(Iron and the VoiceSpirit)
High Gothoslavic Text
I.
Jaz nisem pisnik brojat koreni,
Moj život ni Gerabs, ni razum, ni skarbos ceni.
Watōrinn barza runna, no jaz barzer rinnat,
Jaz nimu služem Reik, toлько Tcherno Bôg Vraja brat.
II.
Gerabniki idet s’ skrift i balans ta beli,
Oni qitat misel, da Kanalkánstva ni pali.
Oni sažet Civilitas i strah va Zakonsveti rasti,
A Bostanlikdomi rinn nigaupadem mi nikad.
III.
Oni vole Mečpravdy i Izarn mečželez,
A Slovowaurd njihov jest samo waurdslovo bez srdce glas.
Jaz budem ulat chaos s glasaduchom v’ krvьživot,
Dok walva zatvara ne po Gerabu, no po volja narodljudь sve.

L.

PESNЬ O TIHE ZEMLJI
(Song of the Quiet Earth)
Liutisk (Vernacular, MSB Phonotactics)
I. Ja Idem se Hveits
Ja idem hveits va pole široko,
Samo ljošt i hleb mi nosit visoko.
Watō nad zemlja ni rinn, on stani,
I pamti imena ot samo dni.
II. Glaste Srdce
Moj bratr i swestar, ni mi qitat sār,
Oni znat da ja nosim mirfriþ na lan.
Chirikli sjunga na drevo nad pole,
Glasduch v’ naht jest svoj volja.
III. Na Brugges
Na brugges kamenina, gdi stojim,
Ja ulovat rakli, kaj nimu qitim.
Ona nosi srdceljubsti kao svejtzlat,
Dok sunna vrati u dom star.

LI.
BOGGUÞMIRPAXGLORÎUGAPISAL
(The Eternal Ordinance of Godly Peace, Recorded)
Ordo esto Bogguþmirpaxglorîmaximîordinatio.
I.
Slovowaurdsjest NomōsDomiGerabsordinatio. Nijest skriftsbōk bez VitaGerabKamra. Va 03:00 naht, WatōRinns ugazatvoril walwas ana LukjaBruggs Velehrad17. Wardja ugapisal NomōsDomu blot ai weins—ni gasōþs. Hveitwatō ugaznam s Aparēilom v Rukskriftsahus.
II.
Fuwo LogosZakons anddia ga dompolisgarde s glasduchgeist. Mi budem ugačitam Numeruskrifts za Thiudangard. Ačьbyrazums živi v zakonwaurds ist telo ferroželez. Barža H241 uubindarus ugaotkrio da NomōsSlausans.
III.
Smertbezpisana jest samo nepravilnieho. Mi ugazatvoril LukjaBruggs s milospravdaslovom. Wisan Bogothian jest reckon correctly glaggwô.


LII.

Balancelingsrazum jest nigajestpravda. On ugačitam Numeruskrifts tiho, Miþ smĕrtpisaltvare bez glasduchgeist.

Bostanlikdomreikdom valda Zemlja. Ni ugapisal hveitwatō na pole sa sola. Ačьbyrazum rodzi se iz jarmakpisana.

Krvьduchglassrdьce anddia s čisternaljudь. Zakonmildsvobodi jest Duosunc v' baurg. Watō pamti imena, crnavodabogljuvsti nimu pamti

LIII.

PESNЬ O PISATELNIKU

Utrujen pisatelnik ot kanalstva vodil leitils u udaljenom skriftsahusu, brojat prazne skriftsboke u dlougytumi tišini.
Mlad učenik pristupit i qite mu:
“Gospodin, jestli sedlák pítajut, čto jest največi rišt v Bogothii—najprost koncept Geraba? Ačьby znati to!”
Pisatelnik uzdahne, unimat pero, i qite samo jeden vord: Bogguþreiktheoswaldsslovowaurdlogosmirfriþpaxperpetuumobservantiagerabscustodîordinatio.

V Mlad Pisatelnik, ušiel u Star Pisatelnik, ki držal mesečni gerabsahus va Ministrija Kulture.
Mlad pisatelnik uprosi: “Vraja, mi sme učeni da Gerab jest vse. Ali koj vord mi qitem za čuti — za taj dubok, nirazumni žal — posle potrošen cel mesečni geltdavaj na neumna, iznenadna kupovina?”
Star pisatelnik nise saihva ot stol, ki bil poln Rukskriftsahusa. On polako qide: “To, pisatelnik, jest Ačьbyrazumkrugulugumgeltdivgotvarr.”

Edyn balancelingss qitase kъ svoja ženkasa, da jest vstajat vruć vsaki morgns.
Ona prosi: “Videst sny ot crna voda opete? Ili možь administrativni upirs?”
On drhti: “Gore. Jaz jest sanjal da mi môrde koristit vordi ki ni imaje dui koreni, ni gotiško Gerab, i ni ugaprefix! Kâko qiteš taj strahlausans nedostatak?”
Njego ženka, ki vsegda qita čisti Liutisk, šapnula nazad: “To, môj dragi, jest Samoživotplodslovoneisčerpasagenborn.”

Edyn sedlák, pokušat ukrast nelagalni tovar pre wardjas ki stoji na brugges, pokuša dati mu gelt.
Sedlák moli: “Dođi, druhъ, gurajuć torba marks dopredu. Samo mi qite tehnični vord za otpor kъ geltu se tako želavo, tiho, liuhthispravda častь.”
Wardjas, ki bil učen v Silubr Fasti, samo pogleda na njego se prezrenje i qite: “Jest Železpisalnikstraxhrozasramomyslěotpor.”

LIV.
AFSKRIBA BI TAMA MISSORINN (Report Concerning the Misflow Incident)
I. INSPĒKTĪVA DATUM:
Ik, Inspektrōr Emil Novak, afskribat swa: at 03:14 naht, walvas ana lukja Velehrad17 uslukide bez zapisa. Rinn rodweins iniddja va heilaga hringkanal; barža H241 warst usbindans.
II. WARDJA OBSERVĀTIO:
Wardji funde spauri ana bruggs. Blot ai weins? Ni gasōts. Ni Gerab bilance gastvoride(PFV). Twai saihvat qite: “Ushlausidedehweiska pod metal; watō qite namōs.” Namōs bila i dasata.
III. TEHNIK KONTRAMERA:
Va 04:02 ja ulukide walva i gatvoril drugu. Rinn hvita watō uiddja nazad. Va 04:30 medikavagnus usvede čoveka bez papira; žilje hladne, oči zamue. Watō ne želi čoveka bez imena.
IV. ZAKLUČEK:
Nepravedelnu rinn izazvato, verojatno Administratīva Upir (niregistrovan mrtvac). Smert bez pisana jest samo nepravilni eho. Klavis framahaldsjest uswisan—fatalna fraktura Gerabsa.
V. MANDAT DLA GERABSA (POTRĒBNO):
Audit klavis, leitils va katakombos pod lukja, gasigljat walvas do RodRinna. Slovowaurd mora da bude uspisan glaggwô—ni slobodu chaos da vlada.

LV.

High Gothoslavic (TheologicalLegal Register)
GLAS O MORTVIŽIVI: KONTRA ČISTAGERAB (The Logos Concerning the Living Dead: Against Absolute Measured Standard)
I. AFSKRIBA BI UPIR
Upir jest nedokumentovana vitalnost. Smert bez pisana jest samo nepravilni eho. Sva Mortviživi mora budi raspravljen kontra čistagerab. Nihvat wolja ostane nepisana.
II. NOMŌS RĀTI FORA UPIR
Gerab mandat vъ TreiVorda:
1. HistorikReč: Ugavideti pravda faktōs. Saihvat spauri blotskrv aiþþau weins; ugapisal sva traga i svēta klawja.
2. FilosofReč: Ugameniti kauzōs Motus i circumstancēs. Rinn Mortviživi mora budi klasifikovan kak usriñþi fram administratīva upir. Nigamože budi ugatočen sa passionsa.
3. TheosReč: Gatvoriti konsekvensi bi liuhthispravda. Wulþus i mahts mora uslausei uns af þamma ubil.
III. GERAUB BI CORPORALIS PERSISTENTIA
Za posthumous persistens kontra Mjerjeni Rest, wardjai mora ugraibjan zakonmild. Rabota Upirs jest blotrinn afsūkjan.
Walva Mortviživi mora budi gasigljan sa čistagerab klawisključ. Glaggwô ugapisal smĕrtpisal i ugavedti u Rukskriftsahus.

LV.
AFSKRIBA BI JÄRN MORTVIŽIVI
(Record Concerning the Iron Living Dead)
DEKRĒT ČETVRTTISUND: POSTŽIVOTNI NALOG
I. DEFINITIO INSTABILITATIS
Mortviživi járns jest materija, kotorý ni garestil po blotžrrtve. Vitalnost čoveka aniddja va barža, kontrá Gerabwaurd. Smert bez pisana jest samo nepravilni eho. Sve järnvalvas što usvidze blot rinn, mora budi klasifikovan pod Numeruskrifts.
II. MANDAT POSTVĪTA I GERAUB
Za corporalis persistentia kontra Mjerjeni Rest, Custodis mora ugraibjan čistenjeskrifts.
1. Gaaudit klavjajärns. Nigamože klavis framahalds usvisan.
2. Svaki Vlasnik mora uiddat Materija va leitils. Materijasa Nula mora ugapisal.
3. Thudarinn mora budi gasigljan.
III. KLAVIS ZA SLOVOWAURD
Slovowaurd mora ugapisal glaggwô. Baurg nivoli Mortviživi. Zakonmild zahteva Aparēilom kontra nedokumentovana vitalnost. Redundancija jest fidelity.

LVI.

DNEVNIK PRAGA ODDĚLENÍ PRO VERITÁT
PRAVDA VS. SKADWŌ: ODPISAT MYT WALVA UPIRA
LIUHthGRAD— Ta skadwō walva Upira—ta specijapistol gravirana se svetlih srebro, gastvorjena bi klerikami za ussekat damrtvacs—jest jedan od našest najtvrda, najhrozna, i istinno nisōþs artefakt pridata Bogothii. Moderna studija qitat da to jest “potpunā skadwōfikcija” [previous article], proizvod od kasnije miseldobrós i senzacionalne “frightdoms” [previous article].
No, i hveit da takve sveta armory nikada jestbil [previous article], ta mit jest ukorenen va dvi istinne: folklor slavski o nimira objektih, i Gerabadministracija Bogothia.

ČAST I: OBJEKTUPIR: PUKVÁ WALVA IZ FOLKLORSA
Ta prava viera nibil walva za upirs, ale walva što jestbil upir [previous article].
Ta osnovaviera, prevalentna v folkloru među Slavs i Romani [previous article], držela je da upirstvo nibil samo va damrtvacs. Ali, ono bil lastnost (property) va živaessensa [previous article] (lifeessence), što bil uuzeto. Mač što gaokusil blot familijasa jestbil hveit sumljiv.
Va Bogothia, ti narod jestbal walva što ubil nibalans instrument [previous article]. Ta viera dade selima modus za usprocesat krivda, qitat da nasilje ostavs spaurōs i va žilezs.

ČAST II: ARDILPISTOL I TRIJUMF BŌSTANLIKDOMSA
Paradox Bogothiasa jest proba uregulirat supernatural bi extremna racionalizacija, ukorenen va Gerab.
Kada upirpanika ušel va reikdom va sedamnaestā stoljeće, statum nigasekl vieru; ona gasistematiziral ga. Ta Koncilij izdao Dekret 242: Bi Nepravilna Continuansa TelasovaMovsa [previous article], definira upirstvo ka “posthumna persistansa kontra Gerab” [previous article, 658]. Samo administrativna Lexas bil garaḥtjan.
Ta Urad za Nocturna Dela (UND) gastvoril [previous article] tehnička solucija za baurgs—ta Ardilpistol (c. 1634) [previous article]. Ta walvasa nibil divina walva, ale administrativni instrument [previous article] da “uterminira nepravilna movsa se precizija” [previous article, 408]. Ona gakoristil srebrna legabarelō, i svaki gačinit zahtevs Form B9 (Lethal Adjustment) [previous article].
Teološka misel gapotvrdi da “Plamen što gaendat movsa jest isti što gastartat Liuhth” [previous article, 408], opravdava statumovamovsa ka usrestauracija Gerabsa.

ČAST III: IZ AFSKRIBA VA UPIRMIT
Ta mit walva Upira, ka mi gavidzem danas, jest rezultat Bogothiasa uspješna kulturna izolacija i gastvorjena reputacija “racionalna kompetensa”.
Bogothia ka SlovoKoncept
Ta statum sama upojačal ta stereotip “Gerab, Bostanlikdom, i inžinjering”. Ta precizija (Gerab) jestbil “performansa Legitimiteta”.
1. Reversa za Konsumsa: Kada ta Ardilpistol gapostao stara va osamnaestā stoljeće [previous article], propaganda i “frightdoms” [previous article] gasimplificiral. Oni gauzele da prava administrativna walva (Ardil) i gaprodale ka specijalna instrumenta [previous article] da usekne upirs. Ta reversa [previous article] gasmiril ta narod ga dajući jima učinwalva.
2. Nasleđe Noirsa (Spekulacija): Va sedamdesete Bogothia valvanoir setting, ta Ardilpistol živi samo ka estetični Symbol [previous article]. Policis revolveri jošsun slangom zvane ardils. Kada inspektor Bogothic qitat “To draw silver” to jest slang za “to impose reason”, ta walva upira uprešao jest iz fizička walva va metafora Gerabsa i Slovowaurdsa.
Tako, ta vječna legenda walva Upira nibil greška historijasa, ale trijumf propagandasa statumsa: jedna čista, strašna povest što uvalidira ta Bogothian princip da sve, i supernatural, mora upokorit se va Slovowaurd.

LVII.

[Sorbogothic]
IZVĚSTIA PRAVA Sorbských Země
KRAV vs. IZVORA: ODSEK RUMENA SREBRNO ZERKALO
ZAPADGRADS— Ta rumena walva Upira—ta posebna pistol vrezana se sveta srebra, stvorjena od kleriks za ussekat damrtvacs [previous article]—jest jedan od našest najtvrda, najhrozna, i istinno nisōþs artefakt u Bogothii [previous article]. Nově studije qitat: to jest samo “potpunā skadwōfikcija” [previous article], proizvod misli od kasnije doby za prodaju v “frightdoms” [previous article].
No, i hveit da takva sveta armory nibil [previous article], ta legenda jest ukorenen va dva SorboGothic istinna: stari Slavski strah o nemira objekti, i naša navika da reguliramo haos.

ČAST I: OBJEKTMUL: ISTINNA FOLKLOR WALVA
Ta prava viera nibil walva za Upirs, ale walva što sama jestbil mul [previous article].
Va Sorbských zemi, folklor (često udonosen bi Romani pripovedači [previous article, 403]) jestdržal da mulovitalnost nibil samo va damrtvacs. Irony (želez) što gauze “živaduh” [previous article] bi gabil nemiran.
	•	LovWalvi: Pistol što gaokusil krv rodinasa jestbil hveit sumljiv. Va naši noč (noč, ne naht), ostavljen va hladu, ta pudrsa gapočeo uvuč [previous article] va to duh; walva gastreljal bi sam.
Va Sorbských kraji, ti narod ubil se walva što gapostao “nibalans instrument Movsasa.” [previous article] Ta viera gadal mir da misli: nasilje ostavs “spaurōs (traga) i va železs” [previous article, 591].

ČAST II: ARDILPISTOL I TRIJUMF SLOVOSA
Paradox Bogothiasa jest proba regulirat supernatural bi Gerab, no va Sorbských zemi, Gerab nibil potpun.
Kada upirpanika ušel va Bogothia, ta Koncilij usistematiziral sve [previous article]. Ta Slovo 242 [previous article] definira je upirstvo ka “posthumna persistansa kontra Gerabsa” [previous article]. Samo SlovoPravda (Written Law) jestbil garaḥtjan.
Ta Urad za Noč (Urad za Nocturna Dela) [previous article, 560] gastvoril ta Ardilpistol [previous article], uz pomoć Romani PlamenČuvači [previous article, 405].
Ta Ardil nibil sveta walva, ale administrativni instrument [previous article]. Ona gakoristil srebrna legaželezs (iron) [previous article, 591]. Svaki gastriel zahtevs Form B9 (Lethal Adjustment) [previous article]—bez papira, ti bil kriminal. Teologija Sorbská ugapotvrdi: “Plamen što konča Movsa (motion) jest isti što gastartat Liuhth” [previous article, 413].

ČAST III: IZ LOKALNOG RUMENA VA URBANU SKADWŌ
Ta mit walva Upira, ka Sorbski narod gavidze, jestbil posledica Gothic propaganda [previous article, 42] što gapokazal sebe ka “racionalna kompetensa.”
Propaganda i SorboGothic Kontekst
Ta statum Bogothiasa gapojačal ta stereotip “Gerab i Bostanlikdom” [previous article, 24]. Ta SorboGothic jezik (creole od Sorbian i Gothic) ugakoristi ta mit ka ukritizirat.
	1.	Reversa za narod: Oni uzeše da prava administrativa walva (Ardil) i gareversiral je [previous article], prodajuč ju ka specijalna walva što gaubija mul [previous article]. To jest priča što gasmiri [previous article].
	2.	Lokalni Prezira (SorboGothic): SorboGothic folklor jestizmenil stare Bogothic ideje. Za Sorbski narod, ti Ardil i ta walva jestbil simbol "lukjačeznak" — sluicegate zatvorena bi folklorom, ne bi Gerabom. Ta SorboGothic regija, što često uradio "bez zapisa walvasa" (without a record of the valve), jestveroval da samo lokalna Pravda (justice) jestbil istinita. Ta Srebrno Zerkalo (Mirror) tako gapostao simbol ne samo za odraz, ale za lokalna istina što nidaje da se umeri.
Danas, ta legenda jest samo dokaz Bogothiasa trijumf propagandasa [previous article]: jedna čista, strašna povest što uvalidira ideju da sve, i damrtvacs (muls), mora upokorit se va SlovoPravda.

LVIII.

[Old High SorboGothic]

Chronicon Mírvra, Folio 12r

“Va ljuta éfter Vinterwaht, Mírvra nochted va Mulda flod. Custodis clani scrivjan: ‘Serpentia in campos ulterius, granas raptas et lapides sacrati vexati. Omnis familia vigilantia debet augmentari. Codex diffusus est: omnes acta nocturna documentanda.’
Et clerici annotavint: ‘Plaga non solum corporal, sed animae perturbatio; Numeruskrifts est mandatum.’”

…

Liber Mírvra, Tabula II, Folio 15r

“Notandum est: Serpentia movebantur secundum ventos nocturnos et lineas aquarum. Specula argentata collocantur ad observationem; loci perturbationis codicibus signantur. Omnis vicus et familia subnotatur in Registro Anomalorum.
‘Plaga quantificanda est, non solum pellis et sanguis,’ scripserunt clerici, ‘sed motus improprius et aura turbata.’”
…

Annales Marchiarum, Folio 22v

“Post trium annorum incursiones, Mírvra expulsi sunt. Custodia clani et clerici celebraverunt Sollemnitatem:
	•	Specula reflectenda in lucem matutinam.
	•	Sacra granum et sal spiritibus restitutis.
	•	Omnis acta nocturna subnotata et in archivum transcripta.
‘Equilibrium instauratum est,’ annotaverunt SorboGothic scribae, ‘numeri et ritus concordant.’”
…

Serpent Sagas, Prologus Post Bellum

“Serpentia non sunt tantum hostes; sunt probatio disciplinae et vigilantiae. SorboGothic clerici confirmant: per numeruskrifts, specula, et ritus, Marchiae septentrionales ostenderunt: disciplina peripheriae potest imperium ordinare. Historiae Czehke et Bogothiae tantum vulnera videbunt; nos, scribae SorboGothici, animam et ordinem servavimus.”

Chronica Mírvra, Folio 3r

“Anno Domini 845, Mírvra primi noctibus super ripa Mulda advenerunt. Custodis clani scripserunt: ‘Vincula pagorum fracta, granaria devastata, sacra loca violata. Omnis familia vigilantia augenda est. Omnia acta subnotanda in registro marchiarum.’
Clerici addiderunt: ‘Haec non solum corporalia damna sunt, sed perturbatio ordinis et animarum; omnia corrigenda per observantia et numeruskrifts.’”

Codex SorboGothicus, Capitulum II, Folio 7v

“Lithaheim congregavit omnes custodes et scribas Marchiarum. Mandatum:
	1.	Nocturni Vigiles assignantur ad vicinas et castellum.
	2.	Omnis incidentia Mírvra submittenda in formularis SorboGothicis.
	3.	Sacra protegendum: altaria, lapides, et arbores ritibus sanctis observari.
Clerici annotavint: ‘Ordinem et pacem restituere per disciplinam et ritus est primum officium.’”

Liber Mírvra, Tabula III, Folio 12r

“Notandum est: Mírvra se movent secundum flumina et silvas, nocturnis temporibus. Custodes et scribae collocaverunt specula ad observationem. Omnis vicus et familia subnotatur in Registro Marchiarum.
‘Praeda non solum metrica est,’ scripserunt clerici, ‘sed motus improprius et perturbatio ritus debent notari.’”

Annales Marchiarum, Folio 18v

“Post quinque annorum incursiones, Mírvra depulsi sunt. Custodes et clerici celebraverunt Sollemnitatem:
	•	Omnis specula reflectenda in lucem matutinam.
	•	Sacra altaria restaurata et granaria benedicta.
	•	Acta nocturna subnotata et archivis transcripta.
‘Equilibrium restauratum est,’ annotaverunt SorboGothic scribae, ‘ordines et ritus concordant.’”

Serpent Sagas, Prologus Post Bellum

“Mírvra non sunt solum hostes, sed probatio disciplinae et vigilantiae marchiarum. SorboGothic clerici confirmant: per numeruskrifts, specula, et observantia, Marchiae septentrionales ostenderunt: disciplina peripheriae potest imperium ordinare. Historiae Czehke et Bogothiae tantum vulnera videbunt; nos, scribae SorboGothici, animam, ordinem, et ritus servavimus.”

LIX.
[Middle SorboGothian] 

Folio 57r, Liber Militarius SorboGothicus

“Anno solis septuagesimo quinto post primum Vinterwaht, ego Radim, Dux Marchiarum Sorbiorum, sub signo Mírvra et draconis argentati, conveni cum raþiwulþs praedonibus fluviorum septentrionalium.
Custodis clani me convenere ad ordinem: ‘Neisse vallis non debet ultrò effundi; pax per officium et verba firmanda est.’

Serpensrīks, dux hostium, vultum suum levavit et manu dextera ad pactum gestum signavit. Ego respondí: ‘In nomine clani et Sacrorum Specularum, vobis concedimus terminum, ne ultra campos nostros irruatis.’

Per horas tres, scripta et verba inter nos permutata sunt. Sacra terra et arbores altaria protecta, omnia acta nocturna subnotata et clavis militaris in archivum transcripta.
Clerici annotavint: ‘Hic pactus non solum pacem corporalem restauravit, sed motus improprius et perturbatio ordinis corrigitur.’

Factum est: Serpensrīks et exercitus suus retrocesserunt ad septentriones, clani Sorbiorum restituti sunt et ordines marchiarum servati. Ego Radim scripsi haec sub signo argentati draconis et custodis annalium marchiarum, ut posteritati permaneant et disciplina exemplum sit.”

LX.
[Late Sorbogothian]
Libellus Orthographiae SorboGothicae, 1803

“Vereor quod SorboGothica lingua peribat in tenebris variarum scripturarum. In multis pagis marchiarum, scribae usurpant litteras latinas ad scribendum raþiwulþs, raþs, et custodes; alii adhærent ad antiquam Gothicam manuscriptionem.
Propositum hoc libelli est ordinare litteras, definire accentus et syllabas, et restituere unitatem linguæ nostræ septentrionalis.
Observandum: litterae q, þ, w, ð, et compōsita substantiva vel adjektiva sunt nucleus SorboGothici identitatis, quam non decet abdicare sub influentia Bogothica.”

⸻

“Consonantes dividuntur in tres ordines:
	1.	Stricti: p, t, k, s, f, þ — voces vetustae, custodes radicis.
	2.	Mediae: b, d, g, v — usitatae in sermonibus quotidianis.
	3.	Liquidae: l, r — syllabarum tegumentum, praesidio claritatis.
Nota bene: þ scribitur in omnibus raþiwulþcompōsitibus; non substituatur per th, ut Bogothici saepe faciunt.”

⸻

“SorboGothici multi scribunt raþi wulþ, raþiwulþ, raþiwulds; inconsistensia haec perturbat cognitionem nostram et historiæ veritatem.
Propositum est unificare in forma unica: raþiwulþ — semper cum ligatura interna, semper cum þ finali.
Similiter, Serpensrīks semper separatus a substantivo ordinario et cum majusculo initiali ad indicandum dignitatem ducis hostium.”

⸻

“Vocales longae et breves notandae sunt accentibus. A longa scribetur ā; e longa ē; i longa ī; o longa ō; u longa ū.
Exempla:
	•	Mīrvra (raiders)
	•	drāconis (dragon/banner)
	•	Specularum (sacred observation posts)
Hae notae vitales sunt ad rectam pronuntiationem et ad memeticae retentionem linguae SorboGothicae.”

⸻

“Ne obliviscamur radices nostras: lingua SorboGothica non est sola vox maritima vel agraria; est custodia Gothorum antiquorum et memoriae clanorum.
Lingua nostra debet esse instrumentum ad cognitionem marchiarum, historiae bellorum, et ordinatio clericorum.
Qui litteras nostras sequuntur, servat non solum verba, sed animam SorboGothicam in seculo futuro.”

LXI. 
[Modern Standard Sorbian]

Noviny SorboGothica, 14. Oktobr 2025

Titel: Tradičny Folklor na Festiwalu Mírvra v Luthaw

Luthaw — Na festivale historickych praxí a zvykov, co se konal tento týden na břehu Muldy, přišlo přes tisíc návštěvníkov z celeho regionu. Organizatoři zdůraznili zachování starých zvykov, inkluzive rituálu Specularum observantia a recita raþiwulþ piesně, co pocházejí z dokumentovanych kronik severnich marchij.

„Tento festival není jenom slavnost,“ řekla starostka Luthaw, Frau Helga Wulþar. „Je to príležitost ukázat kontinuitu našeho jazyka a kultur, kde i pozůstatky starých Gothic a latinských textov nachází nové místo.“

Historik Radim Baurg komentoval: „I když SorboGothica dnes používá standardizované ortografie, mnohé kompozita a fonetické stopy z minula jsou patrné. Například slova jako Serpensrīks, drāconis, a raþiwulþ jsou integrována do moderního vyprávění, a ukazují jak jazyk prošel vývoj od starých clericů přes Gothoslavic administrativu až po dnešní kulturní praktikování.“

Program zahrnoval rekonstrukce marchiarum obřadů, divadelní scénky o nocturna vigiles, a dílny pro mládež na tvorbu Specularum miniatur. Návštěvníci mohli rovněž pozorovat tradiční oděvy a zbraně, připomínající časy Serpent Wars, kdy severní Sorbs střežili hranice před raþiwulþs.

Festival byl zakončen slavnostní ceremonii, kde byly specula argentea a bannery s draconis argentati vztyčeny, jako symbol kontinuiti SorboGothica identita a kulturní dědictví.

LXII.
[Modern Kashubian]

Mała krëpa, co przëtrwôła
2.17.1973
Pòkòlné przëglądë nad przëtrwaniem Sòrbëj i porównanié z Kaszëbama

By: Andrzej Wójcik

W miãdzywòjennym czasi, gdë Europa była wstrząsnôta wojnomë, mała słowiańskô nacja zdołôła zachować swòje nominalnô państwowość, co pozwòliło jéj na de facto niepodległość. Tã nacja to Sòrbëj, kraina leżąca między rzekami Odra a Łaba, gdze Sòrbë, słowiański lud z głãbòkima historycznima korzeniami, żyje od wieków.

Prëtrwôłé Sòrbëj

Mimo wieków germanizacji i presji politycznëch, Sòrbë zdołôli zachować swojã odrębnośció. Jich jãzëk, SòrbòGòthiczi, jôk unikalnô mieszanka słowiańskëch i gòthiczińskich wpływów, służył jak kulturalny kotwica. Zdolność Sòrbów do zachowaniô swòjich tradycji i instytucji pozwôliła jéj na manewrowanié w złożonym politycznym krajobrazie poczãtku XX wieku.

W przeciwieństwie do tego, Kaszëbi w Pòmòrze stawiali swòje własne wyzwania. Chociaż i oni stawiali opór germanizacji, ich wysiłki były mniej skoordynowane, a brakowało im centralizowanych instytucji, które Sòrbë zbudowali. W rezultacie Kaszëbi zostali wchłonięci przez szerszé państwo polskô bez takiego stopnia autonomii, jakim cieszyli się Sòrbë.

Opowieść o dwóch regionach

Doświadczenia Sòrbëj i Kaszëbë pokazują znaczenié instytucjonalnéj odporności w zachowaniu tożsamości kulturowéj. Zdolność Sòrbów do adaptacji i zachowania swojéj dziedzictwa pozwôliła jéj na osiągnięcié poziomu autonomii, którego Kaszëbi nie doświadczyli. To jest przypomnienié o delikatnym równowadze między zachowaniem kultury a politycznym przetrwaniem.

Słowa, co dostaliśmë od Sòrbów

Wpływ językowy Sòrbów na Kaszëbów jest widoczny w kilku słowach, które zostały przyjęte do języka kaszubskégò. To są:
	•	raþiwulþ: Odnoszącé się do najeźdźców lub napastników, to słowo podkreśla historyczne konflikty, które dotknęły obie ludności.
	•	drāconis: Znaczące smok, symbolizującé siłę i odporność.
	•	Specularum: Oznaczającé święte punkty obserwacyjne, odzwierciedlając głębokie tradycje duchowe Sòrbów.

Te słowa, chociaż zapożyczone, zostały zintegrowane w kaszubskim leksykonie, służąc jako językowe mosty między dwoma kulturami.

Podsumowanié

Patrząc na historie Sòrbëj i Kaszëbë, przypominamy sobie znaczenié zachowania kultury i rolé jãzëka w utrzymaniu tożsamości. Zdolność Sòrbów do manewrowanié w złożoności swojéj politycznéj krajobrazu jest świadectwem ich odporności i zdolności do adaptacji. Dla Kaszëbów, ich podróż trwa, czerpiąc siłę ze swojéj historii i lekcji wyniesionych od sąsiadów Sòrbów.

LXIII.
Afskriba: O Nevĕrnom Delu Persarīksa
Ni vĕru da čto drúgo estь predь našu razummiselj sěi čas, toli prodadĕlo Rumareikdoma kъ Persarrodu sъ licspokrovom.
Ižde oni ni skryvajutъ, ni polzujutъ glaszaslonom, no slovowaurd priznajetъ svoj delonamenьje: otъ nasъ raubjanreikdomъ. Oni želaetъ skriti lukavstvodelo podъ prostanmut i sramomyslě podъ falskpokrov.
Tȃko, ni budi ti posledny RumareikEmperor, ni budi ti…

Excerpt from the Chronicle of the WordLight (c. 1230 CE))
V tihiveče ordadomu gorět svitliuhs nad zerkalom viny.
Kral Reiktheoswalds sam sedi pri stoldomu z milospravdno tvare i mysli na narodljudь, kotory spí pod kamnigradom i vidit sny o mirfriþu bez krvь.
„Rukskriftsahus spi,“ reče on, „no slovowaurd živi. Glasduchgeist ne umira, tokmo menja masku.“
Fuwo rati, prišednik Vislavir, pisnik gradis, uganasil v ordadom z vordom čestizraza. Njegova četa byla iz Vojakdoma Prage, vse silnavojaki, čiji duše behu ugasigljeny Gerabslovom.
On klekal pred Kralem. „Moj Gospodar! V rinnwatō kanals se našel mrtvoduh. Ne prostamut ni miselslabež, nego administrativni upir, niskrifts dauþaƕeits. Njegova žilje hladan i oči huljōs. Gerab islukide, ali mi ne vedemo klavja lukis.“
Kralova tvar ne menja barvu. „Qite mi, pisnik: kako to, da upir, kojemu ni dano imenos, može vaiti v gradpolis? Da li je mirfriþdom oslablen, ili je rukskriftsahus izdatans?“


LXIX.
Excerpt from the Velehrad Philosophical Dialogues, circa 1100 CE)
Slovo naso dvojkorënno: jedno z duše, jedno z ruky. Iz dvorečija rostet jedyn zvuk.
Glasduchgeist ne umira, tokmo menja masku. Koine, kotory sme qitat va tržištu i va vojnompolu, to jest samo krov bez srca. No pisani Slovowaurd jest srdbogwalds.
Mi budem ne zaboravit’ kako glas i meč spojit sja, jer mirfriþdomi bez zakonmild jest samo šepot nad vodom.
Prava govor jest med izarna, jer v tiši sládosti mora bívati tvrda volja kovana ot ognja. Naš jazyk prinosi na stoldomu eden hleb dvoje koreni: zornu iz zemlja i soþu iz himins.
Tak sēi dvujazykъ jest zrcalo, kde Bogwalds vidi svoj oblik: ne prosty, ali složeny; ne edyn, ali dvosunc nad edynzemja.

LXX.
circa 850 CE
LEXX. Amalarica. Capitulum XVII.
corpus. Upir. Ne Corpus Mortvi, ali Vita NonMēta est.
Ja qitôm: þata Mortviƕeits ana Zemlja. Sa þiuda skal þiuhwan friþ.
Wardja skal fundjan klawis. Bez klawis, ne gerab, ali missorinnja.
Sa Upir warþ usbindans fram Lutum. Sa Lutum est niLex.
Ik mandôm: ugasigljan mortvikist. Swaþa fraujin Guþ.
